Delphi Financial Group Inc: NYSE:DFG quotes & news - Google FinanceCookies help us deliver our services. By using our services, you agree to our use of cookiesLearn moreGot itMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreShoppingWalletFinanceDocsBooksBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsSearch FinanceAdobe Flash Player is required for interactive charts. AllowFinanceDelphi Financial Group Inc(NYSE:DFG)Add to portfolioCompanySummaryNewsRelated companiesHistorical pricesFinancialsMarketsNewsPortfoliosStock screenerGoogle Domestic TrendsRecent Quotes (30 days)You have no recent quoteschg | %




Delphi Financial Group Inc(Inactive)
 








Address
1105 N Market St Ste 1230WILMINGTON, DE 19801-1216United States
- Map+1-302-4785142 (Phone)+1-302-4277663 (Fax)

Website links


http://www.delphifin.com/










Delphi Financial Group, Inc. (Delphi) is a financial services company focused on specialty insurance and insurance-related businesses. Delphi manages all aspects of employee absence and provides the related group insurance coverages, such as long-term and short-term disability, life, excess workers’ compensation for self-insured employers, large casualty programs including large deductible workers’ compensation, travel accident, dental and limited benefit health insurance. The Company’s asset accumulation business emphasizes individual annuity products. The Company offers its products and services in all 50 states, the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico. The Company’s operates in two segments: group employee benefit products and asset accumulation products. In May 2012, Tokio Marine Holdings, Inc. acquired the Company. In May 2012, Tokio Marine Holdings, Inc. acquired the Company.







Google Finance Beta available in: Hong Kong - Canada - U.S. - China - U.K.Information is provided "as is" and solely for informational purposes, not for trading purposes or advice, and may be delayed.To see all exchange delays, please  see disclaimer.©2017 Google - Google Home - Blog - Help - Report a Problem - Privacy Policy - Terms of Service

	Market Report: Delphi Financial Group, Inc.: Company Profile and SWOT Analysis

















































ABOUT US

• PUBLISHERS
• CONTACT US
• CART




Login | Register















All Industries
Business & Finance
-- Business
-- Financial Services
-- Insurance
-- Marketing
Consumer & Food
-- Beverages
-- Consumer Goods
-- Food
-- Retailing
Healthcare
-- Biotechnology
-- Healthcare
-- Medical Devices
-- Pharmaceuticals
Heavy Industry
-- Construction
-- Energy
-- Manufacturing
-- Materials
-- Transportation
Internet & Media
-- E-Business
-- Internet
-- Media
-- Publishing
Public Sector
-- Defense
-- Education
-- Government
Telecom & Computing
-- Computer Technology
-- Fixed Networks
-- Software
-- Wireless
Company/Country Reports
-- Company Reports
-- Country Reports
-- Regional Reports


 
            













                        Processing...




Delphi Financial Group, Inc.: Company Profile and SWOT Analysis

     
                        May 22, 2017 - Timetric 
                    
                - 14 pages 
                - USD $125 
         





Click here to open the POPUP


                        You've added the following report to your cart:CLOSE








Cart Summary



                                    Total Items: 
                                

                                    SubTotal: 
                                


    









Report Summary


Table of Contents


Companies


Request Details


Related







This report is a crucial resource for industry executives and anyone looking to access key information about "Delphi Financial Group, Inc.The report utilizes a wide range of primary and secondary sources, which are analyzed and presented in a consistent and easily accessible format. Timetric strictly follows a standardized research methodology to ensure high levels of data quality and these characteristics guarantee a unique report.Report HighlightsDelphi Financial Group, Inc. (Delphi), a subsidiary of Tokio Marine Holdings Inc., is a specialty insurance provider. The company, through its subsidiaries, offers a range of specialty insurance products and services to individuals and corporate clients. The portfolio of products offered by the company includes group life insurance, group term insurance, group dental insurance, annuity insurance, workmen's compensation insurance, self-insurance bonds and large casualty programs. It offers services such as claim settlement, insurance consultancy and advisory services, loss portfolio transfer services, disability management services, account management services, leave management and tracking services and nurse case management services. The company also offers call center support services, actuarial services and underwriting services. The company's subsidiaries sell and distribute its products and services through independent insurance agents and brokers. Delphi is headquartered in Wilmington, Delaware, the US.The company reported net premium written of JPY232 billion in FY2016, a decline of 3.9% over FY2015.Report ScopeExamines and identifies key information and issues about "Delphi Financial Group, Inc." for business intelligence requirements.Studies and presents the company's strengths, weaknesses, opportunities (growth potential) and threats (competition). Strategic and operational business information is objectively reported.The profile also contains information on business operations, company history, major products and services, key employees, and locations and subsidiaries.Reasons to Get this ReportQuickly enhance your understanding of "Delphi Financial Group, Inc.Gain insight into the marketplace and a better understanding of internal and external factors which could impact the industry.Increase business/sales activities by understanding your competitors' businesses better.Recognize potential partnerships and suppliers.
1 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Business Analysis1.1 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Company Overview1.2 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Business Description1.3 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Major Products and Services2 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Mergers & Acquisitions and Partnerships2.1 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - M&A and Partnerships Strategy3 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - SWOT Analysis3.1 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - SWOT Analysis - Overview3.2 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Strengths3.3 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Weaknesses3.4 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Opportunities3.5 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Threats4 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - History5 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Key Employees6 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Key Employee Biographies7 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Locations and Subsidiaries7.1 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Head Office7.2 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Other Locations and Subsidiaries8 Appendix8.1 Methodology8.2 DisclaimerList of TablesTable 1: Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Major Products and ServicesTable 2: Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - HistoryTable 3: Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Key EmployeesTable 4: Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Key Employee BiographiesTable 5: Delphi Financial Group, Inc. - Subsidiaries
Companies Mentioned in this ReportDelphi Financial Group, Inc.
This report does not have a press release associated with it









Order Today!

FORMAT: PDF 
$125  USD
LICENSE: Single User 
DELIVERY: By Email - 1 Business Day


























The Fast Market Research Advantage

Only the Best
            All of our research is sourced from the most trusted and established global analysts and consultancies
Client Focused
            From start-ups to multinationals, we focus on providing the right research to our diverse client base
Shop Securely
            Our US-based customer service team and eCommerce systems adhere to the highest data security standards
Industry-leading Customer Support
            Individualized assistance from our expert staff is never more than an email or phone call away




BEST PRICE GUARANTEE
We are committed to providing the best research at the lowest cost.  We will match any published price for the same report, guaranteed!



EASY ORDERING
Once you’ve found the right report, click ‘order now’ and complete the checkout process
using any major credit card, check or wire/bank transfer.Need multi-user or enterprise license pricing?  Contact us for a custom quote!
                  




About the Publisher
Timetric is an independent economic and business research firm providing critical intelligence on emerging economies and key global industries.  They provide detailed economic and sector intelligence, business insights and authoritative, independent commentary.

Publisher Details







Privacy Policy | Terms of Use | FLASHALERTS


Copyright &copy 2017 Fast Market Research, Inc.

























Home | Delphi Financial Group


















Skip to main content




Main menuHome
Company
Our Businesses
Management
Tokio Marine
Contact Us
 
 
 










Delphi Financial Group, Inc. is a financial holding company focused on specialty insurance and insurance-related service businesses in North America.
 
 




 

 





© 2012 Delphi Financial Group, Inc. All rights reserved.




Legal/Privacy Information
 


 
 






Delphi Financial Group, Inc. : Company Profile and SWOT Analysis [Updated: 22-05-2017]












































SPi Global Market Reports
Latest Global Market Reports at 12:33 BST







Search for Market Research: 









You are here: Home > Market Research Reports > Delphi Financial Group, Inc. : Company Profile and SWOT Analysis [Updated: 22-05-2017] > Description





Delphi Financial Group, Inc. : Company Profile and SWOT Analysis [Updated: 22-05-2017]
	
Published by Timetric: 22 May 2017 | 601518 | In Stock


Description
Table of Contents
Tables
Details
Related Reports




SummaryThis report is a crucial resource for industry executives and anyone looking to access key information about "Delphi Financial Group, Inc."

The report utilizes a wide range of primary and secondary sources, which are analyzed and presented in a consistent and easily accessible format. Timetric strictly follows a standardized research methodology to ensure high levels of data quality and these characteristics guarantee a unique report.DetailsTimetric's "Delphi Financial Group, Inc. : Company Profile and SWOT Analysis" contains in depth information and data about the company and its operations. The profile contains a company overview, key facts, major products and services, SWOT analysis, business description, company history, financial analysis, mergers & acquisitions, key employees, company locations and subsidiaries as well as employee biographies.

This report is published by Timetric
	Timetric provides information solutions and technologies that enable organizations to drive business value and manage business risk.

	Our suite of products and services allows clients to identify market and investment opportunities, assess competitive threats, manage and understand risk and improve business practices, decision-making and regulatory compliance.

	Timetric products are currently in use by tens of thousands of professionals within over 1,500 financial services firms and many other organizations around the world.









Buy This Report Now




$125 |  Price



$250 |  Site License Price



$375 |  Enterprise License Price
     Request Best Price Request Sample    Download Free Report Summary PDF Download our FREE report summary PDF. It contains all the information on these web pages, plus a Proforma Invoice request form, should you need it to satisfy your company's internal order procedures.   Ordering Information Orders are processed immediately and you will be notified of the despatch date on confirmation of your order. Accepted Card Types





 Buy now using our secure payment system.  

Extensive Library of Reports Available
388,332 professional market reports and company analyses now available.
About SPi Reports

We specialise in selling market research and company reports from leading market research publishers. Use our comprehensive search service to find the reports that you're looking for.

	Personal Service 

	We are based in the UK and are committed to quality customer service. If you need help, contact our sales team for personal assistance: phone +44 (0) 1305 753769 or email office@sectorpublishing.com.













Market Research Reports and Corporate Date from SPi Reports

Privacy Policy
Terms and Conditions
Contact Us
About SPi Reports
Security

SPi Reports is published by Sector Publishing Intelligence Ltd. Company Registered in England 07519380 © Sector Publishing Intelligence Ltd 2017. [Admin Only]
All rights reserved. All other trademarks recognized. Copyright © 2011-2017 - Sector Publishing Intelligence Limited.

Download Our Free Report Summary PDFDownload our FREE report summary PDF. It contains all the information on these web pages, plus a Proforma Invoice request form, should you need it to satisfy your company's internal order procedures.×
Google
Google
                            Author: Jon Sloper NewsAndMarketResearch
Site design and development by www.alacrify.co.uk
























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Delphi Financial Group, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 7:33 AM ET
Insurance

Company Overview of Delphi Financial Group, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Delphi Financial Group, Inc., a financial services company, engages in specialty insurance and insurance-related businesses in the United States. It operates in two segments, Group Employee Benefit Products and Asset Accumulation Products. The Group Employee Benefit Products segment provides disability, group life, and excess workers’ compensation insurance products. It also offers travel accident, voluntary accidental death and dismemberment, group dental, and limited benefit health insurance products, as well as workers’ compensation and casualty treaty reinsurance. This segment markets its group products to employer-employee groups and associations in various industries primarily through ...
Delphi Financial Group, Inc., a financial services company, engages in specialty insurance and insurance-related businesses in the United States. It operates in two segments, Group Employee Benefit Products and Asset Accumulation Products. The Group Employee Benefit Products segment provides disability, group life, and excess workers’ compensation insurance products. It also offers travel accident, voluntary accidental death and dismemberment, group dental, and limited benefit health insurance products, as well as workers’ compensation and casualty treaty reinsurance. This segment markets its group products to employer-employee groups and associations in various industries primarily through independent brokers and agents. The Asset Accumulation Products segment primarily offers fixed annuities, including single premium deferred annuities, flexible premium annuities, and multi-year interest guarantee products to individuals through networks of independent insurance agents. The company also provides integrated disability and absence management services, including event reporting, leave of absence management, claims and case management, and return to work management. Delphi Financial Group, Inc. was founded in 1987 and is based in Wilmington, Delaware. As of May 15, 2012, Delphi Financial Group, Inc. operates as a subsidiary of Tokio Marine & Nichido Fire Insurance Co., Ltd.
Detailed Description


1105 North Market StreetSuite 1230P O Box 8985Wilmington, DE 19899United StatesFounded in 19871,964 Employees



Phone: 302-478-5142

Fax: 302-427-7663

www.delphifin.com







Key Executives for Delphi Financial Group, Inc.




Mr. Robert Rosenkranz


      	Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of RSLIC
      


Age: 74
        







Mr. Stephan A. Kiratsous


      	Chief Financial Officer, Executive Vice President and Member of The Board of Directors
      


Age: 53
        







Mr. Mark A. Wilhelm


      	Chief Executive Officer of SNCC
      


Age: 64
        







Mr. Lawrence Edmund Daurelle


      	CEO of Reliance Standard Life Insurance Co. and President of Reliance Standard Life Insurance Co.
      


Age: 65
        







Mr. Chad William Coulter


      	Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary
      


Age: 54
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 1st Atlantic Surety Company United States 212 Capital Group, LLC United States 21st Century Life and Health Company, Inc. United States 3 Mark Financial, Inc. United States 534 Las Americas, LLC United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Delphi Financial Group, Inc., please visit www.delphifin.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























 DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP INC/DE (Form: S-3, Received: 08/09/2004 17:27:10) 











As filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 9, 2004

Registration No. 333-





SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION



Washington, D.C. 20549





FORM S-3



REGISTRATION STATEMENT UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933




DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP, INC.


(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)






          Delaware                                     13-3427277
(State or other jurisdiction             (I.R.S. Employer Identification Number)
 of incorporation or organization)






1105 North Market Street

Suite 1230

P.O. Box 8985

Wilmington, Delaware 19899

(302) 478-5142

(Address, including zip code, and telephone number, including area code, of

registrants' principal executive office)




Robert Rosenkranz

Chairman of the Board,

President and Chief Executive Officer

Delphi Financial Group, Inc.


1105 North Market Street

Suite 1230

P.O. Box 8985

Wilmington, Delaware 19899

(302) 478-5142

(Address, including zip code, and telephone number,

including area code, of agent for service)









                                   Copies to:

    Chad W. Coulter, Esq.                  Geoffrey E. Liebmann, Esq.
       General Counsel                    Cahill Gordon & Reindel LLP
Delphi Financial Group, Inc.                     80 Pine Street
  1105 North Market Street               New York, New York 10005-1702
         Suite 1230                              (212) 701-3000
        P.O. Box 8985
 Wilmington, Delaware 19899
       (302) 478-5142

                              ____________________








Approximate date of commencement of proposed sale to the public: From time
to time after the registration statement becomes effective.


If the only securities being registered on this Form are being offered
pursuant to dividend or interest reinvestment plans, please check the following
box. |_|


If any of the securities being registered on this Form are to be offered on
a delayed or continuous basis pursuant to Rule 415 under the Securities Act of
1933, please check the following box. |X|


If this Form is filed to register additional securities for an offering
pursuant to Rule 462(b) under the Securities Act, check the following box and
list the Securities Act registration statement number of the earlier effective
registration statement for the same offering. |_|


If this Form is a post-effective amendment filed pursuant to Rule 462(c)
under the Securities Act, check the following box and list the Securities Act
registration statement number of the earlier effective registration statement
for the same offering. |_|


If delivery of the prospectus is expected to be made pursuant to Rule 434,
please check the following box. |_|
















                         CALCULATION OF REGISTRATION FEE

====================================================================================================================
                                                          Proposed Maximum     Proposed Maximum       Amount of
   Title of Each Class of Securities   Amount to Be      Offering Price Per   Aggregate Offering    Registration
           to Be Registered             Registered          Security (1)          Price (1)             Fee
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
  Class A Common Stock (par value       357,722(2)             $39.72           $14,208,717.84       $1,800.25
    $.01 per share)
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------







(1)  Estimated solely for the purpose of calculating the registration fee in
accordance with Rule 457(c) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended,
based upon the average of the high and low reported sale prices of our
Class A Common Stock on the New York Stock Exchange on August 6, 2004,
which was $39.72.


(2)  Pursuant to Rule 416 under the Securities Act of 1933, any additional
shares of Class A Common Stock issued as a result of share subdivisions,
bonus issues or similar transactions are deemed to be registered herewith.


The registrants hereby amend this registration statement on such date or
dates as may be necessary to delay its effective date until the registrants
shall file a further amendment which specifically states that this registration
statement shall thereafter become effective in accordance with Section 8(a) of
the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or until this registration statement
shall become effective on such date as the Commission, acting pursuant to said

Section 8(a), may determine.





The information in this prospectus is not complete and may be changed. We may
not sell these securities until the registration statement filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission becomes effective. This prospectus is not an
offer to sell these securities and we are not soliciting offers to buy these
securities in any jurisdiction where the offer is not permitted.





PRELIMINARY PROSPECTUS








Subject to Completion,  August 9, 2004

                                 357,722 Shares

                          DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP, INC.
                              Class A Common Stock










The selling shareholders named in this prospectus are offering up to 357,722
shares of Delphi Financial Group, Inc.'s Class A Common Stock. Delphi Financial
Group, Inc. will not receive any of the proceeds from their sale of our shares,
although we will receive the exercise price of the related options upon exercise
by the selling shareholders. Delphi Financial Group, Inc. will pay all expenses
incurred in registering and listing these shares, including legal and accounting
fees.


The Class A Common Stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol
"DFG." On August 6, 2004, the last reported sale price of the Class A Common
Stock on the New York Stock Exchange was $39.58.




Neither the Securities and Exchange Commission nor any state securities
commission has approved or disapproved of these securities or determined if this
prospectus is truthful or complete. Any representation to the contrary is a
criminal offense.




See "Risk Factors" beginning on page 3 for certain information relevant to an
investment in the securities offered hereby.


The securities may be offered in amounts, at prices and on terms determined at
the time of offering. The securities may be sold directly to you or through
broker-dealers.


, 2004








TABLE OF CONTENTS




Page









Prospectus Summary............................................................1
Risk Factors..................................................................3
Where You Can Find More Information...........................................8
Incorporation of Documents by Reference.......................................8
Use of Proceeds...............................................................9
Price Range of Our Common Stock and Dividend Payments.........................9
Dividend Policy...............................................................9
Description of Capital Stock of Delphi.......................................10
Selling Shareholders.........................................................13
Plan of Distribution.........................................................15
Legal Opinions...............................................................15
Experts......................................................................15














PROSPECTUS SUMMARY



In this prospectus, unless the context requires otherwise, "we," "us,"
"our" and the "Company" refer to Delphi Financial Group, Inc. and its
subsidiaries, and "Delphi" refers to Delphi Financial Group, Inc. only and not
any of its subsidiaries.



Delphi Financial Group, Inc.



Delphi is a holding company, organized as a Delaware corporation in 1987,
whose subsidiaries provide integrated employee benefit services. We manage all
aspects of employee absence to enhance the productivity of our clients and
provide the related insurance coverages: long-term and short-term disability,
excess and primary workers' compensation, group life, travel accident and
dental. Our asset accumulation business emphasizes individual fixed annuity
products. We offer our products and services in all fifty states and the
District of Columbia. Our two reportable segments are group employee benefit
products and asset accumulation products.



Operating Strategy



Our operating strategy is to offer financial products and services that
have the potential for significant growth, which require specialized expertise
to meet the individual needs of our customers and which provide us the
opportunity to achieve superior operating earnings growth and returns on our
shareholders' capital.


We have concentrated our efforts within certain niche insurance markets,
primarily group employee benefits for small to mid-sized employers, where nearly
all of the employment growth in the American economy has occurred in recent
years. We also market our group employee benefit products and services to large
employers, emphasizing unique programs that integrate both employee benefit
insurance coverages and absence management services. We also operate an asset
accumulation business that focuses primarily on offering fixed annuities to
individuals planning for retirement.


Our primary operating subsidiaries are as follows:


Reliance Standard Life Insurance Company, founded in 1907 and having
administrative offices in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, and its subsidiary, First
Reliance Standard Life Insurance Company, underwrite a diverse portfolio of
group life, disability and accident insurance products targeted principally to
the employee benefits market. Reliance Standard Life also markets asset
accumulation products, primarily fixed annuities, to individuals and groups.
Delphi, through Reliance Standard Life Insurance Company of Texas, acquired
Reliance Standard Life and First Reliance Standard Life in November 1987.


Safety National Casualty Corporation focuses primarily on providing excess
workers' compensation products to the self-insured market. Founded in 1942 and
located in St. Louis, Missouri, Safety National is one of the oldest continuous
writers of excess workers' compensation insurance in the United States. We,
through SIG Holdings, Inc., acquired Safety National in March 1996. In 2001,
Safety National formed an insurance subsidiary, Safety First Insurance Company,
which also focuses on selling excess workers' compensation products to the
self-insured market.


Matrix Absence Management, Inc., founded in 1987, provides integrated
disability and absence management services to the employee benefits market
across the United States. We acquired Matrix in June 1998.


We are incorporated in the State of Delaware. Our principal executive
offices are located at 1105 North Market Street, Suite 1230, Wilmington,
Delaware 19899. Our telephone number is (302) 478-5142. Our website is
www.delphifin.com. The information contained on our website is not incorporated
by reference into this prospectus.









Cautionary Note Regarding Forward-Looking Statements



In connection with, and because we desire to take advantage of, the "safe
harbor" provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we
caution readers regarding certain forward-looking statements in this prospectus
and in any other statement made by us, or on our behalf, whether in future
filings with the SEC or elsewhere. Forward-looking statements are statements not
based on historical information and which relate to future operations,
strategies, financial results, prospects, outlooks or other developments. Some
forward-looking statements may be identified by the use of terms such as
"expects," "believes," "anticipates," "intends," "judgment" or other similar
expressions. Forward-looking statements are necessarily based upon estimates and
assumptions that are inherently subject to significant business, economic,
competitive and other uncertainties and contingencies, many of which are beyond
our control and many of which, with respect to future business decisions, are
subject to change. Examples of such uncertainties and contingencies include,
among other important factors, those affecting the insurance industry generally,
such as the economic and interest rate environment, federal and state
legislative and regulatory developments, including but not limited to changes in
financial services and tax laws and regulations, market pricing and competitive
trends relating to insurance products and services, acts of terrorism or war,
and the availability and cost of reinsurance, and those relating specifically to
our business, such as the level of our insurance premiums and fee income, the
claims experience, persistency and other factors affecting the profitability of
our insurance products, the performance of our investment portfolio and changes
in our investment strategy, acquisitions of companies or blocks of business, and
ratings by major rating organizations of our insurance subsidiaries. These
uncertainties and contingencies can affect actual results and could cause actual
results to differ materially from those expressed in any forward-looking
statements made by us, or on our behalf.


-2-









RISK FACTORS



An investment in the offered securities involves a degree of risk.
Prospective investors should carefully evaluate the following considerations in
addition to the other information in this prospectus, including the information
in the documents incorporated by reference, before purchasing any of the
securities offered hereby.



Risks Related to Us and Our Business



Reserves established for future policy benefits and claims may prove
inadequate.


We establish reserves for future policy benefits and unpaid claims and
claim expenses relating to our insurance products. These reserves are calculated
using various generally recognized actuarial methodologies and are based upon
assumptions that management believes are appropriate and which vary by type of
product. Annually, external actuarial experts also review our methodologies,
assumptions and the resulting reserves. The estimation process is complex and
involves information obtained from company-specific and industry-wide data, as
well as general economic information. The most significant assumptions made in
the estimation process for future policy benefits relate to mortality,
morbidity, claim termination and discount rates. The reserves for unpaid claims
and claim expenses are determined on an individual basis for reported claims and
estimates of incurred but not reported losses are developed on the basis of past
experience. The most significant assumptions made in the estimation process for
unpaid claims and claim expenses are the trend in loss costs, the expected
frequency and severity of claims, changes in the timing of the reporting of
losses from the loss date to the notification date, and expected costs to settle
unpaid claims. The assumptions vary based on the year the claim is incurred.
Disability reserves for unpaid claims and claim expenses are discounted using
interest rate assumptions based upon projected portfolio yield rates for the
assets supporting the liabilities. The assets selected to support these
liabilities produce cash flows that are intended to match the timing and amount
of anticipated claim and claim expense payments. Excess workers' compensation
claim reserves are discounted using interest rate assumptions based on the
risk-free rate of return for U.S. Government securities with a duration
comparable to the expected duration and payment pattern of the claims at the
time the claims are settled. The rates used to discount reserves are determined
annually. The methods and assumptions used to establish reserves for future
policy benefits and unpaid claims and claim expenses are continually reviewed
and updated based on current circumstances, and any resulting adjustments are
reflected in earnings currently.


Our projected ultimate insurance liabilities and associated reserves are
estimates, which are subject to variability. This variability arises because the
factors and events affecting the ultimate liability have not all taken place,
and thus cannot be evaluated with certainty. Moreover, under the actuarial
methodologies discussed above, these estimates are subject to reevaluation based
on developing trends with respect to our loss experience. Such trends may emerge
over longer periods of time, and changes in such trends cannot necessarily be
identified or predicted at any given time by reference to current claims
experience, whether favorable or unfavorable. If our actual loss experience from
our current or discontinued products is different from our assumptions or
estimates, our reserves could be inadequate. In such event, our results of
operations, liquidity or financial condition could be materially adversely
affected.


The market values of our investments fluctuate.


The market values of our investments vary depending on economic and market
conditions, including interest rates, and such values can decline as a result of
changes in such conditions. Increasing interest rates or a widening in the
spread between interest rates available on U.S. Treasury securities and
corporate debt, for example, will typically have an adverse impact on the market
values of the fixed maturity securities in our investment portfolio. If interest
rates decline, we generally achieve a lower overall rate of return on
investments of cash generated from our operations. In addition, in the event
that investments are called or mature in a declining interest rate environment,
we may be unable to reinvest the proceeds in securities with comparable interest
rates. We may also in the future be


-3-





required or determine to sell certain investments at a price and a time when the
market value of such investments is less than the book value of such
investments.


Declines in the fair value of investments that are considered in the
judgment of management to be other than temporary are reported as realized
investment losses. We evaluate, among other things, the financial position and
prospects of the issuer, conditions in the issuer's industry and geographic
area, liquidity of the investment, changes in the amount or timing of expected
future cash flows from the investment, and recent downgrades of the issuer by a
rating agency to determine if and when a decline in the fair value of an
investment below amortized cost is other than temporary. The length of time and
extent to which the fair value of the investment is lower than its amortized
cost and our ability and intent to retain the investment to allow for any
anticipated recovery in the investment's fair value are also considered. We have
experienced and may in the future experience losses from other than temporary
declines in security values. Such losses are recorded as realized investment
losses in the income statement.


Our investment and financing strategy exposes us to default and other
risks.


The management of our investment portfolio is an important component of our
profitability since a substantial portion of our operating income is generated
from the difference between the yield achieved on invested assets and, in the
case of asset accumulation products, the interest credited on policyholder funds
and, in the case of our other products for which reserves are discounted, the
discount rate used to calculate the related reserves.


We are subject to the risk, among others, that the issuers of the fixed
maturity securities we own will default on principal and interest payments. A
major economic downturn or any of the various other factors that affect issuers'
ability to pay could result in issuer defaults. Because our investments consist
primarily of fixed maturity securities and short-term investments, such defaults
could materially adversely affect our results of operations, liquidity or
financial condition. We continually monitor our investment portfolio and attempt
to ensure that the risks associated with concentrations of investments in either
a particular sector of the market or a single entity are limited.


At June 30, 2004, mortgage-backed securities comprised 22% of our total
invested assets. Mortgage-backed securities subject us to a degree of interest
rate risk, including prepayment and extension risk, which is generally a
function of the sensitivity of each security's underlying collateral to
prepayments under varying interest rate environments and the repayment priority
of the securities in the particular securitization structure. We seek to limit
the extent of this risk by emphasizing the more predictable payment classes and
securities with stable collateral.


Through our insurance subsidiaries, we maintain a program in which
investments are financed using advances from various Federal Home Loan Banks. At
June 30, 2004, we had outstanding advances of $130.0 million, of which $15.0
million were obtained during the second quarter of 2004. These advances, which
were obtained at a fixed rate, have a weighted average term to maturity of 7.1
years. A total of $60.0 million of these advances will mature during the
remainder of 2004. In addition, we have utilized reverse repurchase agreements,
futures and option contracts and interest rate swap contracts from time to time
in connection with our investment strategy. These transactions require us to
maintain securities or cash on deposit with the applicable counterparty as
collateral. As the market value of the collateral or contracts changes, we may
be required to deposit additional collateral or be entitled to have a portion of
the collateral returned to us.


The types and amounts of investments made by our insurance subsidiaries are
subject to the insurance laws and regulations of their respective states of
domicile. Each of these states has comprehensive investment regulations. In
addition, Delphi's revolving credit facility also contains limitations, with
which we are currently in compliance in all material respects, on the
composition of our investment portfolio.


Almost half of the voting power of Delphi is controlled by Robert
Rosenkranz, one of the selling shareholders, whose interests may differ from
those of other securityholders.


-4-





Each share of our Class A Common Stock entitles the holder to one vote and
each share of our Class B Common Stock entitles the holder to a number of votes
per share equal to the lesser of (1) the number of votes such that the aggregate
of all outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock will be entitled to cast 49.9%
of all of the votes represented by the aggregate of all outstanding shares of
Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock or (2) ten votes. Each share of
Class B Common Stock is convertible at any time into one share of Class A Common
Stock. The holders of the Class A Common Stock vote as a separate class to elect
one director of the Company. As of August 6, 2004, Mr. Robert Rosenkranz, our
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer and one of the selling
shareholders, by means of beneficial ownership of the corporate general partner
of Rosenkranz & Company and direct or beneficial ownership, had the power to
vote all of the outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock, which as of such
date represented 49.9% of the voting power of the Common Stock. Holders of a
majority of the combined voting power of our stockholders have the power to
elect all of the members of our Board of Directors (other than the director
elected by the holders of Class A Common Stock) and to determine the outcome of
fundamental corporate transactions, including mergers and acquisitions,
consolidations and sales of all or substantially all of our assets. We are a
party to consulting and other agreements with certain affiliates of Rosenkranz &
Company which are expected to continue in accordance with their terms.


Because Delphi is a holding company, its ability to pay dividends on the
Class A Common Stock and service Delphi's debt will depend on receipt of funds
from subsidiaries and Delphi's other financial resources.


Because Delphi is a holding company, its ability to pay dividends on the
Class A Common Stock and make payments in respect of Delphi's indebtedness will
depend upon receipt of sufficient funds from its subsidiaries, as well as our
financial resources at the holding company level.


We had approximately $89.6 million of financial resources available at the
holding company level at June 30, 2004, which was primarily comprised of
investments in the common stock of Delphi's investment subsidiaries, fixed
maturity securities, balances with independent investment managers, and
short-term investments. The assets of the investment subsidiaries are primarily
invested in balances with independent investment managers. Other sources of
liquidity at the holding company level include dividends paid from subsidiaries,
primarily generated from operating cash flows and investments. Our insurance
subsidiaries are permitted, without prior regulatory approval, to make dividends
payments totaling $54.0 million during 2004, of which $1.0 million has been paid
during the first half of 2004. In general, dividends from our non-insurance
subsidiaries are not subject to regulatory or other restrictions. We had $78.0
million of borrowings available to us under Delphi's revolving credit facility
as of June 30, 2004. A shelf registration statement is also in effect under
which we may issue securities yielding proceeds of up to $106.2 million. Our
current liquidity needs, in addition to funding our operating expenses, include
principal and interest payments on outstanding borrowings under Delphi's
revolving credit facility, interest payments on our 8.00% Senior Notes due 2033
(the "2033 Senior Notes"), and distributions on our Capital Securities and our
Floating Rate Capital Securities. The maximum amount of borrowings available
under Delphi's revolving credit facility, which expires in December 2006, is
$100.0 million. The 2033 Senior Notes mature in their entirety in May 2033 and
are not subject to any sinking fund requirements but are redeemable by us at par
at any time on or after May 15, 2008. The junior subordinated debentures
underlying the Capital Securities are not redeemable prior to March 25, 2007.
The junior subordinated debentures underlying the 2003 Capital Securities are
redeemable, in whole or in part, beginning May 15, 2008.


Our financial position exposes us to interest rate risks.


Because our primary assets and liabilities are financial in nature, our
consolidated financial position and earnings are subject to risks resulting from
changes in interest rates. We manage this risk by active portfolio management
focusing on minimizing our exposure to fluctuations in interest rates by
matching our invested assets and related liabilities and by periodically
adjusting the crediting rates on our annuity products.


-5-





Profitability of certain group employee benefit products is also affected
by the difference between the yield achieved on invested assets and the discount
rate used to calculate the related reserves. We manage this risk by adjusting
the prices charged for these products.


Our ability to reduce our exposure to risks depends on the availability and
cost of reinsurance.


We transfer our exposure to some risks through reinsurance arrangements
with other insurance and reinsurance companies. Under our reinsurance
arrangements, another insurer assumes a specified portion of our losses and loss
adjustment expenses in exchange for a specified portion of policy premiums. The
availability, amount, cost and terms of reinsurance may vary significantly based
on market conditions. Any decrease in the amount of our reinsurance will
increase our risk of loss and any increase in the cost of such reinsurance will,
absent a decrease in the reinsurance amount, reduce our premium income. In
either case, our operating results could be adversely affected unless we are
able to accordingly adjust the prices or other terms of our insurance policies
or successfully implement other operational initiatives, as to which no
assurance can be given. Furthermore, we are subject to credit risk with respect
to reinsurance. We obtain reinsurance primarily through indemnity reinsurance
transactions in which we are still liable for the transferred risks if the
reinsurers fail to meet their financial obligations. Such failures could
materially affect our results of operations, liquidity or financial condition.


Some reinsurers experienced significant losses related to the terrorist
events of September 11, 2001. As a result of this and other market factors,
higher prices and less favorable terms and conditions continue to be offered in
the reinsurance market. These market conditions are reflected in the terms of
the replacement reinsurance arrangements entered into during 2003 for our excess
workers' compensation and long-term disability products. It is likely that, in
the future, our reinsurers will continue to seek price increases, although the
extent of such increases cannot currently be predicted. Also, there has been
significantly reduced availability of reinsurance covering risks such as
terrorist and catastrophic events. Accordingly, substantially all of our
coverages of this nature were discontinued in 2002, which would result in us
retaining a higher portion of losses from such events if they occur. We have not
been able to replace such coverages on acceptable terms due to present market
conditions, and there can be no assurance that we will be able to do so in the
future. However, under the Terrorism Act, the federal government will pay 90% of
our covered losses relating to acts of international terrorism from property and
casualty products directly written by Safety National Casualty Corporation above
our annual deductible. The occurrence of a significant catastrophic event could
have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, liquidity or
financial condition.


The insurance business is a heavily regulated industry.


Our insurance subsidiaries, like other insurance companies, are highly
regulated by state insurance authorities in the states in which they are
domiciled and the states in which they conduct business. Such regulations, among
other things, limit the amount of dividends and other payments that can be made
by such subsidiaries without prior regulatory approval and impose restrictions
on the amount and type of investments such subsidiaries may have. These
regulations also affect many other aspects of our insurance subsidiaries'
businesses, including, for example, risk-based capital requirements, various
reserve requirements, the terms, conditions and manner of sale and marketing of
insurance products, claims-handling practices and the form and content of
required financial statements. These regulations are intended to protect
policyholders rather than investors. The ability of our insurance subsidiaries
to continue to conduct their businesses is dependent upon the maintenance of
their licenses in these various states.


From time to time, increased scrutiny has been placed upon the insurance
regulatory framework, and a number of state legislatures have considered or
enacted legislative measures that alter, and in many cases increase, state
authority to regulate insurance companies. In addition to legislative
initiatives of this type, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners
and insurance regulators are continuously involved in a process of reexamining
existing laws and regulations and their application to insurance companies.
Furthermore, while the federal government currently does not directly regulate
the insurance business, federal legislation and administrative policies (and


-6-





court interpretations thereof) in a number of areas, such as employee benefits
regulation, age, sex and disability-based discrimination, financial services
regulation and federal taxation, can significantly affect the insurance
business. It is not possible to predict the future impact of changing regulation
on our operations and those of our insurance subsidiaries.


Our insurance subsidiaries can also be required, under solvency or guaranty
laws of most states in which they do business, to pay assessments to fund
policyholder losses or liabilities of insurance companies that become insolvent.


The financial services industry is highly competitive.


We compete with numerous other insurance and financial services companies.
Many of these organizations have substantially greater assets, higher ratings
from rating agencies, larger and more diversified portfolios of insurance
products and larger agency sales operations than us. Competition in asset
accumulation product markets is also encountered from the expanding number of
banks, securities brokerage firms and other financial intermediaries marketing
alternative savings products, such as mutual funds, traditional bank investments
and retirement funding alternatives.


We may be adversely impacted by a decline in the ratings of our insurance
subsidiaries.


Ratings with respect to claims-paying ability and financial strength have
become an increasingly important factor impacting the competitive position of
insurance companies. Each of the rating agencies reviews its ratings of
companies periodically and there can be no assurance that current ratings will
be maintained or improved in the future. Claims-paying and financial strength
ratings are based upon factors relevant to policyowners and are not directed
toward protection of investors. Downgrades in the ratings of our insurance
subsidiaries could adversely affect sales of their products and could have a
material adverse effect on the results of our operations.


-7-









WHERE YOU CAN FIND MORE INFORMATION



We have filed with the SEC under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended
(the "Securities Act"), a combined registration statement on Form S-3 (herein,
together with all amendments and exhibits, referred to as the "registration
statement") relating to the offered securities.


Delphi is subject to the informational requirements of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), and in accordance
therewith files reports, proxy and information statements and other information
with the SEC. Such reports, proxy statements and other information can be
inspected and copied at prescribed rates at the public reference facilities
maintained by the SEC at Judiciary Plaza, 450 Fifth Street, N.W., Washington,
D.C. 20549. The SEC also maintains a website that contains reports, proxy and
information statements and other information. Please call the SEC at
1-800-SEC-0330 for further information on the public reference rooms. The
website address is http://www.sec.gov. In addition, such material can be
inspected at the offices of the New York Stock Exchange, 20 Broad Street, New
York, New York 10005.





INCORPORATION OF DOCUMENTS BY REFERENCE



The SEC allows Delphi to "incorporate by reference" into this prospectus
the information it files with the SEC, which means that it can disclose
important information to you by referring to another document filed separately
with the SEC. The information that Delphi files after the date of the initial
registration statement and prior to the effectiveness of the registration
statement will be deemed to be incorporated by reference into this prospectus.
The information that Delphi files after the date of this prospectus with the SEC
will automatically update and supersede this information. Delphi incorporates by
reference into this prospectus the document listed below and any future filings
made with the SEC under Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act.


o    Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2003, filed
on March 12, 2004.


o    Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004,
filed on May 7, 2004.


o    Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2004,
filed on August 6, 2004.


Any statement contained in a document incorporated or considered to be
incorporated by reference in this prospectus shall be considered to be modified
or superseded for purposes of this prospectus to the extent that a statement
contained in this prospectus or in any subsequently filed document that is or is
considered to be incorporated by reference modifies or supersedes such
statement. Any statement that is modified or superseded shall not, except as so
modified or superseded, constitute a part of this prospectus.


You may request a copy of any of the documents which are incorporated by
reference in this prospectus, other than exhibits which are not specifically
incorporated by reference into such documents, and Delphi's constitutional
documents, at no cost, by writing or telephoning us at the following:


Delphi Financial Group, Inc.
1105 North Market Street
Suite 1230

P.O. Box 8985

Wilmington, Delaware  19899
Attention:  Secretary

Telephone:  (302) 478-5142


-8-





Delphi has not authorized anyone to give any information or make any
representation about Delphi that is different from, or in addition to, that
contained in this prospectus or in any of the materials that Delphi has
incorporated by reference into this document. Therefore, if anyone does give you
information of this sort, you should not rely on it. If you are in a
jurisdiction where offers to exchange or sell, or solicitations of offers to
exchange or purchase, the securities offered by this document or the
solicitation of proxies is unlawful, or if you are a person to whom it is
unlawful to direct these types of activities, then the offer presented in this
document does not extend to you. The information contained in this document
speaks only as of the date of this document, unless the information specifically
indicates that another date applies.







USE OF PROCEEDS



We will not receive any proceeds from the sale of the shares by the selling
shareholders, although we will receive the exercise price of the related options
upon exercise by the selling shareholders. Any net proceeds that we receive from
any exercise of such options will be used for general corporate purposes.






PRICE RANGE OF OUR COMMON STOCK AND DIVIDEND PAYMENTS



Our Class A Common Stock is publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange
under the symbol "DFG." The following table sets forth for the fiscal quarters
indicated the high and low sales prices for the Class A Common Stock and the
dividends per share declared in respect of those quarters. Sales prices in
certain prior periods have been restated to reflect the 3-for-2 common stock
split distributed in the form of a stock dividend on December 22, 2003. The last
reported sale price of the Class A Common Stock on August 6, 2004 was $39.58 per
share.








                                    High                          Low                    Cash Dividends
                                    ----                          ---                    --------------
Fiscal 2002
   First Quarter                $    26.45                   $    21.87                   $    0.05
   Second Quarter                    30.08                        25.67                        0.05
   Third Quarter                     29.00                        22.57                        0.05
   Fourth Quarter                    27.42                        21.94                        0.05
Fiscal 2003
   First Quarter                $    26.46                   $    21.73                   $    0.05
   Second Quarter                    31.77                        25.67                        0.05
   Third Quarter                     33.63                        30.33                        0.05
   Fourth Quarter                    36.88                        31.08                        0.08
Fiscal 2004
   First Quarter                $    42.30                   $    35.99                   $    0.08
   Second Quarter                    44.53                        36.29                        0.08
   Third Quarter (through            44.85                        39.31                       --
   August 6, 2004)












DIVIDEND POLICY



In 2001, our Board of Directors approved the initiation of a quarterly cash
dividend payable on our Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock. The
quarterly cash dividend was $0.05 per share during 2002 and the first three
quarters of 2003. In the fourth quarter of 2003, our Board of Directors
increased the cash dividend to


-9-





$0.08 per share. In each of the first and second quarters of 2004, our Board of
Directors declared a cash dividend of $0.08 per share. We intend to continue to
pay a quarterly dividend at this level. However, the declaration and payment of
such dividends, including the amount and frequency of such dividends, is at the
discretion of the Board of Directors and depends upon many factors, including
our consolidated financial position, liquidity requirements, operating results
and such other factors as the Board of Directors may deem relevant.









DESCRIPTION OF COMMON STOCK



The following description of the common stock of Delphi does not purport to
be complete and is subject to, and qualified in its entirety by reference to,
the more complete description thereof set forth in the following documents: (i)
Delphi's Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended (the "Certificate of
Incorporation"); and (ii) its By-Laws, which documents have been incorporated by
reference as exhibits to the Registration Statement of which this Prospectus
forms a part.


Delphi currently is authorized to issue 40,000,000 shares of Class A Common
Stock, 20,000,000 shares of Class B Common Stock (the Class A Common Stock and
Class B Common Stock shall be referred to collectively herein as the "Common
Stock") and 10,000,000 shares of preferred stock, par value $.01 per share. As
of July 31, 2004, there were 27,401,599 shares of Class A Common Stock and
4,177,357 shares of Class B Common Stock outstanding. There are no shares of
preferred stock outstanding.


All issued outstanding shares are fully paid and nonassessable.



General



Subject to the limitations imposed by the terms of Delphi's preferred
stock, if any, holders of the Common Stock are entitled to participate equally
in dividends as and when declared by the Board of Directors out of legally
available funds. There are no sinking fund or redemption provisions applicable
to the Common Stock and the shares of Common Stock are not convertible and do
not have any preemptive rights. On liquidation, dissolution, or winding up of
Delphi, whether voluntary or involuntary, after payments have been made to
holders of outstanding shares of Delphi's preferred stock, holders of the Common
Stock have the right to share ratably in the remaining net assets available for
distribution. All shares of Class A Common Stock sold hereunder will be fully
paid and non-assessable.


Wachovia Bank, N.A. is the Transfer Agent for the Common Stock. The Class A
Common Stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange.



Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock



All currently outstanding shares of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common
Stock are fully paid and nonassessable. The holders of the currently outstanding
Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock do not have any preemptive rights
to subscribe for or purchase any additional securities issued by Delphi. No
redemption or sinking fund provisions are associated with the Class A Common
Stock or Class B Common Stock. Cumulative voting is not permitted by holders of
either the Class A Common Stock or Class B Common Stock.


Voting. Each share of Class A Common Stock entitles the holder thereof to
one vote per share. Each share of Class B Common Stock entitles the holder
thereof to a number of votes per share equal to the lesser of (1) the number of
votes such that the aggregate of all outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock
will be entitled to cast 49.9% of all of the votes represented by the aggregate
of all outstanding shares of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock or

(2) ten votes. Proposals submitted to a vote of stockholders will be voted on by
holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock voting together as a
single class (subject to any voting rights which may be granted to holders of
preferred stock), except that holders of the Class A Common Stock will vote as a


-10-





separate class to elect one director (the "Class A Director") so long as the
outstanding shares of Class A Common Stock represent at least 10% of the
aggregate number of outstanding shares of Common Stock. At all meetings of the
stockholders of Delphi, unless a separate vote of any class is required, the
holders of a majority of the voting power of the Class A Common Stock and Class
B Common Stock, represented in person or by proxy, shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business; and, generally, the affirmative vote of the holders
of a majority of the votes cast at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall
be the act of the stockholders of Delphi. The superior voting rights of the
Class B Common Stock might discourage unsolicited merger proposals and
unfriendly tender offers and may therefore deprive stockholders of any
opportunity to sell their shares at a premium over prevailing market prices.


Transfer. The Certificate of Incorporation does not contain any
restrictions on the transfer of shares of Class A Common Stock. Upon transfer of
shares of Class B Common Stock to any person except to a "Permitted Transferee"
(as defined therein), such shares of Class B Common Stock will automatically be
converted into an equal number of shares of Class A Common Stock. Permitted
Transferees of any holder of Class B Common Stock include persons or entities
who on January 24, 1990 were holders or beneficial owners of Class B Common
Stock or had the right to acquire shares of Class B Common Stock upon the
exercise of warrants, certain relatives of such holder of Class B Common Stock,
the trustee of a trust exclusively for the benefit of such holder of Class B
Common Stock and/or one or more of such holder's Permitted Transferees, the
estate of such holder of Class B Common Stock and certain corporations or
partnerships of which two-thirds of the voting power is controlled by or under
common control with such holder of Class B Common Stock.


Conversion. Class A Common Stock has no conversion rights. Class B Common
Stock is convertible into Class A Common Stock, in whole or in part, at any time
and from time to time at the option of the holder, on the basis of one share of
Class A Common Stock for each share of Class B Common Stock converted. If at any
time the number of outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock falls below 5% of
the aggregate number of issued and outstanding shares of Common Stock or the
Board of Directors and the holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of
Class B Common Stock approve the conversion of all of the Class B Common Stock
into Class A Common Stock, then each outstanding share of Class B Common Stock
shall automatically convert into one share of Class A Common Stock. In the event
of a transfer of shares of Class B Common Stock, other than to a Permitted
Transferee, each share of Class B Common Stock so transferred shall be
automatically converted into one share of Class A Common Stock.


Dividends. Holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock are
entitled to receive cash dividends pro rata on a per share basis if and when
such dividends are declared by the Board of Directors of Delphi from funds
legally available therefor. In the case of any dividend paid other than in cash,
holders of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock are entitled to receive
such dividend pro rata on a per share basis. Dividends paid in common stock may
be paid (i) in shares of Class A Common Stock on the Class A Common Stock and
Class B Common Stock, (ii) in shares of Class B Common Stock on the Class A
Common Stock and Class B Common Stock and (iii) in shares of Class A Common
Stock on the Class A Common Stock and in shares of Class B Common Stock on the
Class B Common Stock.


Liquidation, Merger or Consolidation. Holders of Class A Common Stock and
Class B Common Stock share with each other, after payments of any preferential
amounts to which the holders of preferred stock are entitled, on a ratable basis
as a single class, in the net assets of the Company available for distribution
in respect of Class A Common Stock and Class B Common Stock in the event of
liquidation or any payments made on the Common Stock in the event of a merger or
consolidation of Delphi.


Other Terms. Neither the Class A Common Stock nor the Class B Common Stock
may be subdivided or combined in any manner unless contemporaneously therewith
the other class of shares is subdivided or combined in the same proportion.


-11-





Additional shares of Class B Common Stock may not be issued except (i) in
payment of a stock dividend on then outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock;

(ii) in connection with a stock split, reclassification or other subdivision of
then outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock; and (iii) pursuant to the
Company's Amended and Restated Long-Term Performance-Based Incentive Plan.


Delaware Law and Certain Provisions of Delphi's Certificate of
Incorporation


Delphi is subject to the provisions of Section 203 of the Delaware General
Corporation Law ("Section 203"). In general, Section 203 prohibits a publicly
held Delaware corporation from engaging in a "business combination" with an
"interested stockholder" for a period of three years after the date that the
person became an interested stockholder unless (with certain exceptions) the
business combination or the transaction in which the person became an interested
stockholder is approved in a prescribed manner. Generally, a "business
combination" includes a merger, asset or stock sale, or other transaction
resulting in a financial benefit to the stockholder. Generally, an "interested
stockholder" is a person who, together with affiliates and associates, owns (or
within three years prior, did own) 15% or more of the corporation's voting
stock.


The Certificate of Incorporation prohibits stockholders from taking any
action without a meeting, except upon unanimous written consent. In addition,
special meetings of stockholders may only be called by the Board of Directors.
These provisions may have the effect of delaying consideration of a stockholder
proposal until the next annual meeting unless a special meeting is called by the
Board of Directors of Delphi. The Certificate of Incorporation also provides
that the Board of Directors has the exclusive power to fill newly created
directorships and vacancies in the Board. The Certificate of Incorporation
provides that directors of Delphi will not be personally liable for monetary
damages for breach of the director's fiduciary duty as a director, except for
liability (i) for any breach of the director's duty of loyalty to Delphi or its
stockholders, (ii) for acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve
intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law, (iii) for unlawful
payments of dividends or unlawful stock repurchase or redemptions as provided in
section 174 of the Delaware General Corporation Law or (iv) for any transaction
from which the director derived an improper personal benefit. The Certificate of
Incorporation provides that Delphi shall indemnify its officers and directors to
the fullest extent permitted by Delaware law.


-12-









SELLING SHAREHOLDERS






Selling Shareholders Table



The following table presents certain information regarding the selling
shareholders and the maximum number of shares of our Class A Common Stock each
may offer, assuming they exercise their respective options and elect to sell the
shares they will receive upon such exercises.






-------------------------- ------------------- ---------- ------------------ ------------------ -----------
          Name             Shares of Class A    Percent    Maximum Number     Shares of Class    Percent
                              Common Stock                 of Shares That     A Common Stock
                              Beneficially                 May Be Sold In      Beneficially
                             Owned Prior to                 This Offering    Owned After This
                           This Offering (1)                                   Offering. (1)
                                                                                    (2)
-------------------------- ------------------- ---------- ------------------ ------------------ -----------
RR Options LLC.......                 234,090       0.8%            234,090                  0          0%
-------------------------- ------------------- ---------- ------------------ ------------------ -----------
Robert Rosenkranz (3)                 419,460       1.5%            123,632            295,828        1.1%
-------------------------- ------------------- ---------- ------------------ ------------------ -----------








(1)      Beneficial ownership is determined in accordance with the rules of the
SEC and generally includes voting or investment power with respect to
securities. Shares of Class A Common Stock subject to options, warrants
and convertible securities currently exercisable or convertible, or
exercisable or convertible within 60 days, and held by the selling
shareholders are deemed outstanding for purposes of computing the
percentage ownership of each selling shareholder.


(2)      Assumes that all shares included in this prospectus will be sold by the
selling shareholders.


(3)      As of August 6, 2004, Mr. Robert Rosenkranz, our Chairman, President
and Chief Executive Officer and one of the selling shareholders, by
means of beneficial ownership of the corporate general partner of
Rosenkranz & Company and direct or beneficial ownership, had the power
to vote all of the outstanding shares of Class B Common Stock, which as
of such date represented 49.9% of the voting power of the Common Stock.
Mr. Rosenkranz, as the beneficial owner of the corporate general
partner of Rosenkranz & Company, has the power to vote the 4,117,692
shares of Class B Common Stock held by Rosenkranz & Company.
Accordingly, Mr. Rosenkranz may be deemed to be the beneficial owner of
all of the shares of the Company held by Rosenkranz & Company. In
addition, Mr. Rosenkranz has direct or beneficial ownership of 59,665
additional shares of Class B Common Stock and direct or beneficial
ownership of 98,032 shares of Class A Common Stock, as well as direct
or beneficial ownership of 321,428 shares of Class A Common Stock
(including the 123,632 shares that may be sold in this offering) and
715,444 shares of Class B Common Stock which may be acquired pursuant
to stock options within 60 days and 424,733 deferred shares of Class B
Common Stock.



Relationships with the Selling Shareholders



In 1997, we granted options to Robert Rosenkranz, our Chairman, President
and Chief Executive Officer, to purchase 357,722 (after giving effect to
subsequent stock dividends, including a stock split in the form of a stock
dividend) shares of our Class A Common Stock at an exercise price of $18.794 per
share. The options were granted pursuant to our Long Term Performance-Based
Incentive Plan for the performance period consisting of the 1996 calendar year.
In 1999 Mr. Rosenkranz contributed his interest in 234,090 (after giving effect
to subsequent stock


-13-





dividends, including a stock split in the form of a stock dividend) of these
options to RR Options LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, in exchange for
a non-managing membership interest in this company. RRD I Ltd., L.P., a Delaware
limited partnership, is the managing member of RR Options LLC. The general
partner of RRD I Ltd., L.P. is RRT Company, Ltd., which is owned and controlled
by The Robert Rosenkranz Trust. The Robert Rosenkranz Trust is controlled by
HSBC Guyerzeller Trust Company (Cayman), its trustee.


In 1999, Mr. Rosenkranz transferred his interest in RR Options LLC to The
Robert Rosenkranz Family Trust. As a result, The Robert Rosenkranz Family Trust
has a 99% non-managing interest in RR Options LLC, and RRD I, Ltd., L.P. has a
1% managing interest.


The Robert Rosenkranz Family Trust is controlled by Stanley Bergman, acting
in his capacity as sole trustee. The beneficiaries of the trust consist of
children of Mr. Rosenkranz. Mr. Rosenkranz has no economic or voting interest in
The Robert Rosenkranz Family Trust and is not a beneficiary of the trust, nor
does he control such trust.


-14-









PLAN OF DISTRIBUTION



Our Class A Common Stock is traded on the New York Stock Exchange. The
shares covered by this prospectus may be sold from time to time by the selling
stockholders in transactions through the New York Stock Exchange or on one or
more other securities markets and exchanges, in the over-the-counter market, in
privately negotiated transactions, or through the writing of options on the
shares. They may sell the shares at fixed prices that may be changed, at market
prices prevailing at the time of sale, at prices relating to such prevailing
market prices or at negotiated prices. The selling stockholders may effect such
transactions by selling these shares to or through broker-dealers, including
through block trades in which brokers or dealers may attempt to sell these
shares as agents but may position and resell the block as principals to
facilitate the transaction.


Any broker-dealers participating in the distribution of these shares may
receive compensation in the form of discounts, concessions or commissions from
the selling stockholders and/or the purchasers of the shares for whom such
broker-dealers may act as agents or to whom they may sell as principals, or
both. In connection with any sales of these shares by any selling stockholder,
such selling stockholder and any broker-dealers who participate in such sale may
be deemed to be "underwriters" as defined in the Securities Act. Any commissions
paid or any discounts or concessions allowed to any such broker-dealers, and any
profits received on the resale of such shares of common stock purchased by them,
may be deemed to be underwriting discounts and commissions under the Securities
Act.


The rules of the SEC generally prohibit underwriters, brokers, dealers and
certain other persons engaged or participating in the distribution of these
shares, including the selling stockholders, from making a market in such shares
during the "cooling off" period preceding the commencement of such distribution,
which may limit the timing of purchases and sales of our common stock by the
selling stockholders.


In order to comply with the securities laws of certain states, if
applicable, these shares will be sold in such jurisdictions only through
registered or licensed brokers or dealers. In addition, in certain states these
shares may not be sold unless they have been registered or qualified for sale in
the applicable state or an exemption from the registration or qualification
requirement is available and complied with. We have agreed to bear all expenses
incurred in registering and listing these shares.


There can be no assurance that the selling stockholders will exercise their
options in whole or in part or sell any or all of the shares offered hereunder.






LEGAL OPINIONS



Certain legal matters in connection with the offering of the shares of
Class A Common Stock offered hereby will be passed upon for the Company by Chad
W. Coulter, General Counsel of the Company.






EXPERTS



The consolidated financial statements and schedules of Delphi Financial
Group, Inc. and subsidiaries appearing in Delphi Financial Group, Inc.'s Annual
Report (Form 10-K) for the year ended December 31, 2003 have been audited by
Ernst & Young LLP, independent registered public accounting firm, as set forth
in its report thereon included therein and incorporated herein by reference.
Such consolidated financial statements are incorporated herein by reference in
reliance upon such report given on the authority of such firm as experts in
accounting and auditing.


-15-






PART II INFORMATION NOT REQUIRED IN PROSPECTUS






Item 14.  Other Expenses of Issuance and Distribution.



The following table sets forth the costs and expenses, other than
underwriting discounts and commissions, incurred in connection with the
distribution of the securities being registered (all amounts are estimated
except the SEC registration fee).








SEC registration fee....................................   $ 1,800
New York Stock Exchange listing fee for common stock....     2,500
Legal fees and expenses.................................    15,000
Accounting fees and expenses............................    10,000
Miscellaneous...........................................       700
                                                          --------
      Total.............................................   $30,000
                                                          ========












Item 15.  Indemnification of Directors and Officers.



Delphi Financial Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation. Reference is made
to Section 145 of the Delaware General Corporation Law ("DGCL"), which provides
that a corporation may indemnify any person, including an officer or director,
who is, or is threatened to be made, party to any threatened, pending or
completed legal action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal,
administrative or investigative (other than an action by or in the right of such
corporation), by reason of the fact that such person is or was an officer,
director, employee, or agent of such corporation or is or was serving at the
request of such corporation as an officer, director, employee, or agent of
another corporation or enterprise. The indemnity may include expenses (including
attorneys' fees), judgments, fines and amounts paid in settlement actually and
reasonably incurred by such person in connection with such action, suit or
proceeding provided such officer, director, employee, or agent acted in good
faith and in a manner he reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the
corporation's best interest and, with respect to criminal proceedings, had no
reasonable cause to believe that his or her conduct was unlawful. Section 145 of
the DGCL provides further that a Delaware corporation may indemnify officers and
directors in an action by or in the right of the corporation under the same
conditions, except that no indemnification is permitted without judicial
approval if the officer or director is judged to be liable to the corporation.
Where an officer or director is successful on the merits or otherwise in the
defense of any action referred to above or any claim therein, the corporation
must indemnify him against the expenses that such officer or director actually
and reasonably incurred. Article Eighth of the Restated Certificate of
Incorporation of the Company provides for indemnification of its officers and
directors to the full extent permitted by the DGCL.


Article Eighth of the Restated Certificate of Incorporation also provides
that directors of the Company will not be personally liable for monetary damages
for breach of a director's fiduciary duty as a director, except for liability

(i) for any breach of the director's duty of loyalty to the Company or its
shareholders, (ii) for acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve
intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law, (iii) for unlawful payment
of dividends or unlawful stock repurchases or redemptions as provided in Section
174 of the DGCL, or (iv) for any transaction from which the director derived an
improper personal benefit.


II-1









Item 16.  Exhibits.









Exhibit
Number               Description
------               -----------








3.1  Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.2 to our Registration Statement on Form S-1 dated
March 13, 1990 (Registration No. 33-32827).


3.2  Certificate of Amendment of Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the
Company (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to our Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 1997).


3.2  Amended and Restated By-laws of the Company (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.4 to our Registration Statement on Form S-1 dated March 13, 1990
(Registration No. 33-32827).


5.1  Opinion of Chad W. Coulter.


23.1 Consent of Chad W. Coulter (included as part of Exhibit 5.1).


23.3 Consent of Ernst & Young LLP.


24   Powers of Attorney.






Item 17.  Undertakings.




THE UNDERSIGNED REGISTRANTS HEREBY UNDERTAKE:



(1) To file, during any period in which offers or sales are being made, a
post-effective amendment to this registration statement:


(i)  To include any prospectus required by section 10(a)(3) of the
Securities Act of 1933;


(ii) To reflect in the prospectus any facts or events arising after the
effective date of the registration statement (or the most recent
post-effective amendment thereof) which, individually or in the
aggregate, represent a fundamental change in the information set forth
in the registration statement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any
increase or decrease in volume of securities offered (if the total
dollar value of securities offered would not exceed that which was
registered) and any deviation from the low or high end of the
estimated maximum offering range may be reflected in the form of the
prospectus filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) if, in
the aggregate, the changes in volume and price represent no more than
a 20% change in the maximum aggregate offering price set forth in the
"Calculation of Registration Fee" table in the effective registration
statement; and


(iii) To include any material information with respect to the plan of
distribution not previously disclosed in the registration statement or
any material change to such information in the registration statement;


provided, however, that paragraphs (1)(i) and (1)(ii) do not apply if
the information required to be included in a post-effective amendment
by those paragraphs is contained in periodic re-


II-2





ports filed by the Registrant pursuant to section 13 or section 15(d)
of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 that are incorporated by
reference in the registration statement.


(2)  That, for the purpose of determining any liability under the
Securities Act of 1933, each such post-effective amendment shall be
deemed to be a new registration statement relating to the securities
offered therein, and the offering of such securities at that time
shall be deemed to be the initial bona fide offering thereof.


(3)  To remove from registration by means of a post-effective amendment any
of the securities being registered which remain unsold at the
termination of the offering.


(4)  That, for purposes of determining any liability under the Securities
Act of 1933, each filing of the Registrant's annual report pursuant to
section 13(a) or section 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
that is incorporated by reference in the registration statement shall
be deemed to be a new registration statement relating to the
securities offered therein, and the offering of such securities at
that time shall be deemed to be the initial bona fide offering
thereof.


(5)  For purposes of determining any liability under the Securities Act of
1933, the information omitted from the form of prospectus filed as
part of a registration statement in reliance upon Rule 430A and
contained in a form of prospectus filed by the registrant pursuant to
Rule 424(b)(1) or (4) or 497 (h) under the Securities Act shall be
deemed to be part of this registration statement as of the time it was
declared effective.


(6)  For the purposes of determining any liability under the Securities Act
of 1933, each post-effective amendment that contains a form of
prospectus shall be deemed to be a new registration statement relating
to the securities offered therein, and the offering of such securities
at that time shall be deemed to be the initial bona fide offering
thereof.


Insofar as indemnification for liabilities arising under the Securities Act
of 1933 may be permitted to directors, officers and controlling persons of the
Registrant pursuant to the provisions described under Item 15 above, or
otherwise, the Registrant has been advised that in the opinion of the Securities
and Exchange Commission such indemnification is against public policy as
expressed in the Securities Act of 1933 and is, therefore, unenforceable. In the
event that a claim for indemnification against such liabilities (other than the
payment by the Registrant of expenses incurred or paid by a director, officer or
controlling person of the Registrant in the successful defense of any action,
suit or proceeding) is asserted by such director, officer or controlling person
in connection with the securities being registered, the Registrants will, unless
in the opinion of its counsel the matter has been settled by controlling
precedent, submit to a court of appropriate jurisdiction the question whether
such indemnification by it is against public policy as expressed in the
Securities Act of 1933 and will be governed by the final adjudication of such
issue.


II-3










SIGNATURES



Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, Delphi
Financial Group, Inc. certifies that it has reasonable grounds to believe that
it meets all of the requirements for filing on Form S-3 and has duly caused this
Registration Statement to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto
duly authorized, in the City of New York, State of New York, on the 9th day of
August, 2004.



DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP, INC.







/s/ Robert Rosenkranz
------------------------------
Robert Rosenkranz
Chairman of the Board, President
and Chief Executive Officer







II-4






SIGNATURES



Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, this
Registration Statement has been signed by the following persons on the 9th day
of August, 2004, in the capacities indicated.






         Signature                                 Title
         ---------                                 -----

/s/ Robert Rosenkranz                    Chairman of the Board, President and
-------------------------------            Chief Executive Officer (Principal
Robert Rosenkranz                          Executive Officer)


/s/ Robert M. Smith, Jr.                 Executive Vice President and Director
-------------------------------
Robert M. Smith, Jr.

        *                                Director
-------------------------------
Kevin R. Brine

        *                                Director
-------------------------------
Lawrence E. Daurelle

        *                                Director
-------------------------------
Edward A. Fox

        *                                Director
-------------------------------
Harold F. Ilg

        *                                Director
-------------------------------
James N. Meehan

        *                                Director
-------------------------------
Philip R. O'Connor

        *                                Class A Director
-------------------------------
Donald A. Sherman

        *                                Vice President and Treasurer
-------------------------------            (Principal Accounting and Financial
Thomas W. Burghart                            Officer)


*By:  /s/ Robert Rosenkranz
      -------------------------
      Robert Rosenkranz
      Attorney in Fact








II-5












Exhibit 5.1



August 9, 2004


Delphi Financial Group, Inc.

1105 North Market Street, Suite 1230

Wilmington, Delaware 19899


Ladies and Gentlemen:


I am Vice President, Secretary and General Counsel of Delphi Financial
Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and am rendering this
opinion in connection with a registration statement on Form S-3 (the
"Registration Statement") being filed today by the Company with the Securities
and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended (the "Securities Act"). The Registration Statement relates to the
proposed sale by the selling shareholders named therein of up to 357,722 shares
of the Company's Class A common stock, $0.01 par value (the "Shares"), subject
to acquisition pursuant to options (the "Options") previously granted under the
Company's Long-Term Performance-Based Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended to
date (the "Plan").


As Vice President, Secretary and General Counsel of the Company, I have
examined and am familiar with the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the
Company, as amended, and the Restated and Amended By-Laws of the Company. I am
also familiar with the corporate proceedings of the Board of Directors of the
Company to authorize the filing of the Registration Statement and to adopt the
Plan.


In connection with this opinion, I have examined originals, or copies
certified or otherwise identified to my satisfaction, of such documents,
corporate records and other instruments as I have deemed necessary or
appropriate for the purpose of this opinion. In connection therewith, I have
assumed the genuineness of all signatures on all documents examined by me; the
authenticity of all documents submitted to me as originals and the conformity to
the originals of all documents submitted to me as copies; that the Registration
Statement, and any amendments thereto (including post-effective amendments),
will have become effective under the Securities Act; that a prospectus will





have been filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission describing the
Shares offered thereby; and that the Shares will be issued and sold in
compliance with applicable federal and state securities laws and in the manner
stated in the Registration Statement and the prospectus.


Based upon the foregoing, and subject to the assumptions, limitations and
qualifications set forth herein, I am of the opinion that:


1. The Company is a corporation duly organized and validly existing in good
standing under the laws of the State of Delaware.


2. The Shares, when issued pursuant to the exercise of the Options for
consideration equal to the exercise price of $18.794 per share, will be validly
issued, fully paid and nonassessable.


3. I hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to the
Registration Statement and to the reference to me under the heading "Legal
Opinions" in the prospectus constituting a part of the Registration Statement.
Such consent should not be construed to mean that I am within the category of
persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act or the
rules and regulations of the Commission promulgated thereunder.


Very truly yours,






/s/ Chad W. Coulter
---------------------------------
Chad W. Coulter
Vice President, Secretary and
  General Counsel















Exhibit 23.3






Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm



We consent to the reference to our firm under the caption "Experts" in the
Registration Statement (Form S-3, No. 333-xxxxx), dated August 9, 2004, of
Delphi Financial Group for the registration of 357,722 shares of its common
stock and to the incorporation by reference therein of our report dated February
6, 2004, with respect to the consolidated financial statements and schedules of
Delphi Financial Group included in its Annual Report (Form 10-K) for the year
ended December 31, 2003, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.






                                            /s/ ERNST & YOUNG LLP

Philadelphia, Pennsylvania
August 6, 2004
















Exhibit 24






POWER OF ATTORNEY



KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that the undersigned, being a director
and/or officer of Delphi Financial Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the
"Company"), hereby constitutes and appoints Robert Rosenkranz and Robert M.
Smith, Jr., and each of them, his true and lawful attorneys-in-fact and agents,
with full power of substitutions and resubstitution, for him and in his name,
place and stead, in any and all capacities, to sign one or more Registration
Statements for the Company on Form S-3 under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, or such other form as such attorney-in-fact may deem necessary or
desirable, any and all amendments thereto (including post-effective amendments)
and supplements in such form as he may approve, and to file the same, with all
exhibits thereto and other documents in connection therewith, with the
Securities and Exchange Commission, granting unto said attorneys-in-fact and
agents, and each of them, full power and authority to do and perform each and
every act and thing requisite and necessary to be done in connection therewith,
as fully and to all intents and purposes as he might or could do in person,
hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorneys-in-fact and agents, or
any of them, or his or their substitute or substitutes, may lawfully do or cause
to be done by virtue hereof.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has hereto set his hand this 27th day
of July, 2004.






/s/ Kevin R. Brine
-----------------------------
Kevin R. Brine
Director











POWER OF ATTORNEY



KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that the undersigned, being a director
and/or officer of Delphi Financial Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the
"Company"), hereby constitutes and appoints Robert Rosenkranz and Robert M.
Smith, Jr., and each of them, his true and lawful attorneys-in-fact and agents,
with full power of substitutions and resubstitution, for him and in his name,
place and stead, in any and all capacities, to sign one or more Registration
Statements for the Company on Form S-3 under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, or such other form as such attorney-in-fact may deem necessary or
desirable, any and all amendments thereto (including post-effective amendments)
and supplements in such form as he may approve, and to file the same, with all
exhibits thereto and other documents in connection therewith, with the
Securities and Exchange Commission, granting unto said attorneys-in-fact and
agents, and each of them, full power and authority to do and perform each and
every act and thing requisite and necessary to be done in connection therewith,
as fully and to all intents and purposes as he might or could do in person,
hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorneys-in-fact and agents, or
any of them, or his or their substitute or substitutes, may lawfully do or cause
to be done by virtue hereof.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has hereto set his hand this 27th day
of July, 2004.






/s/ Lawrence E. Daurelle
----------------------------
Lawrence E. Daurelle
Director











POWER OF ATTORNEY



KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that the undersigned, being a director
and/or officer of Delphi Financial Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the
"Company"), hereby constitutes and appoints Robert Rosenkranz and Robert M.
Smith, Jr., and each of them, his true and lawful attorneys-in-fact and agents,
with full power of substitutions and resubstitution, for him and in his name,
place and stead, in any and all capacities, to sign one or more Registration
Statements for the Company on Form S-3 under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, or such other form as such attorney-in-fact may deem necessary or
desirable, any and all amendments thereto (including post-effective amendments)
and supplements in such form as he may approve, and to file the same, with all
exhibits thereto and other documents in connection therewith, with the
Securities and Exchange Commission, granting unto said attorneys-in-fact and
agents, and each of them, full power and authority to do and perform each and
every act and thing requisite and necessary to be done in connection therewith,
as fully and to all intents and purposes as he might or could do in person,
hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorneys-in-fact and agents, or
any of them, or his or their substitute or substitutes, may lawfully do or cause
to be done by virtue hereof.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has hereto set his hand this 27th day
of July, 2004.






/s/ Edward A. Fox
-------------------------
Edward A. Fox
Director











POWER OF ATTORNEY



KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that the undersigned, being a director
and/or officer of Delphi Financial Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the
"Company"), hereby constitutes and appoints Robert Rosenkranz and Robert M.
Smith, Jr., and each of them, his true and lawful attorneys-in-fact and agents,
with full power of substitutions and resubstitution, for him and in his name,
place and stead, in any and all capacities, to sign one or more Registration
Statements for the Company on Form S-3 under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, or such other form as such attorney-in-fact may deem necessary or
desirable, any and all amendments thereto (including post-effective amendments)
and supplements in such form as he may approve, and to file the same, with all
exhibits thereto and other documents in connection therewith, with the
Securities and Exchange Commission, granting unto said attorneys-in-fact and
agents, and each of them, full power and authority to do and perform each and
every act and thing requisite and necessary to be done in connection therewith,
as fully and to all intents and purposes as he might or could do in person,
hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorneys-in-fact and agents, or
any of them, or his or their substitute or substitutes, may lawfully do or cause
to be done by virtue hereof.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has hereto set his hand this 27th day
of July, 2004.






/s/ Harold F. Ilg
-----------------------------
Harold F. Ilg
Director











POWER OF ATTORNEY



KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that the undersigned, being a director
and/or officer of Delphi Financial Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the
"Company"), hereby constitutes and appoints Robert Rosenkranz and Robert M.
Smith, Jr., and each of them, his true and lawful attorneys-in-fact and agents,
with full power of substitutions and resubstitution, for him and in his name,
place and stead, in any and all capacities, to sign one or more Registration
Statements for the Company on Form S-3 under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, or such other form as such attorney-in-fact may deem necessary or
desirable, any and all amendments thereto (including post-effective amendments)
and supplements in such form as he may approve, and to file the same, with all
exhibits thereto and other documents in connection therewith, with the
Securities and Exchange Commission, granting unto said attorneys-in-fact and
agents, and each of them, full power and authority to do and perform each and
every act and thing requisite and necessary to be done in connection therewith,
as fully and to all intents and purposes as he might or could do in person,
hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorneys-in-fact and agents, or
any of them, or his or their substitute or substitutes, may lawfully do or cause
to be done by virtue hereof.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has hereto set his hand this 27th day
of July, 2004.






/s/ James N. Meehan
-----------------------------
James N. Meehan
Director











POWER OF ATTORNEY



KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that the undersigned, being a director
and/or officer of Delphi Financial Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the
"Company"), hereby constitutes and appoints Robert Rosenkranz and Robert M.
Smith, Jr., and each of them, his true and lawful attorneys-in-fact and agents,
with full power of substitutions and resubstitution, for him and in his name,
place and stead, in any and all capacities, to sign one or more Registration
Statements for the Company on Form S-3 under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, or such other form as such attorney-in-fact may deem necessary or
desirable, any and all amendments thereto (including post-effective amendments)
and supplements in such form as he may approve, and to file the same, with all
exhibits thereto and other documents in connection therewith, with the
Securities and Exchange Commission, granting unto said attorneys-in-fact and
agents, and each of them, full power and authority to do and perform each and
every act and thing requisite and necessary to be done in connection therewith,
as fully and to all intents and purposes as he might or could do in person,
hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorneys-in-fact and agents, or
any of them, or his or their substitute or substitutes, may lawfully do or cause
to be done by virtue hereof.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has hereto set his hand this 27th day
of July, 2004.






/s/ Philip R. O'Connor
----------------------------
Philip R. O'Connor
Director











POWER OF ATTORNEY



KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that the undersigned, being a director
and/or officer of Delphi Financial Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the
"Company"), hereby constitutes and appoints Robert Rosenkranz and Robert M.
Smith, Jr., and each of them, his true and lawful attorneys-in-fact and agents,
with full power of substitutions and resubstitution, for him and in his name,
place and stead, in any and all capacities, to sign one or more Registration
Statements for the Company on Form S-3 under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, or such other form as such attorney-in-fact may deem necessary or
desirable, any and all amendments thereto (including post-effective amendments)
and supplements in such form as he may approve, and to file the same, with all
exhibits thereto and other documents in connection therewith, with the
Securities and Exchange Commission, granting unto said attorneys-in-fact and
agents, and each of them, full power and authority to do and perform each and
every act and thing requisite and necessary to be done in connection therewith,
as fully and to all intents and purposes as he might or could do in person,
hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorneys-in-fact and agents, or
any of them, or his or their substitute or substitutes, may lawfully do or cause
to be done by virtue hereof.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has hereto set his hand this 27th day
of July, 2004.






/s/ Donald A. Sherman
------------------------------
Donald A. Sherman
Director











POWER OF ATTORNEY



KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that the undersigned, being a director
and/or officer of Delphi Financial Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the
"Company"), hereby constitutes and appoints Robert Rosenkranz and Robert M.
Smith, Jr., and each of them, his true and lawful attorneys-in-fact and agents,
with full power of substitutions and resubstitution, for him and in his name,
place and stead, in any and all capacities, to sign one or more Registration
Statements for the Company on Form S-3 under the Securities Act of 1933, as
amended, or such other form as such attorney-in-fact may deem necessary or
desirable, any and all amendments thereto (including post-effective amendments)
and supplements in such form as he may approve, and to file the same, with all
exhibits thereto and other documents in connection therewith, with the
Securities and Exchange Commission, granting unto said attorneys-in-fact and
agents, and each of them, full power and authority to do and perform each and
every act and thing requisite and necessary to be done in connection therewith,
as fully and to all intents and purposes as he might or could do in person,
hereby ratifying and confirming all that said attorneys-in-fact and agents, or
any of them, or his or their substitute or substitutes, may lawfully do or cause
to be done by virtue hereof.


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has hereto set his hand this 27th day
of July, 2004.






/s/ Thomas W. Burghart
----------------------------------
Thomas W. Burghart
Vice President and Treasurer














Market Research Reports, Delphi Financial Group, Inc. : Company Profile and SWOT Analysis





























Home  | Contact Us |
			  			    Log In



 


(888) 789-6604

















All Categories
Automotive and Transportation
Banking & Finance
Computer &  IT
Consumer Packaged Goods 
Consumer Retail
Electronics & Security
Energy, Utility and Renewable
Internet
Manufacturing & Industry
Pharma & Healthcare
Sustainable Technology
Telecom
Travel & Lifestyle








Advanced search





Account Detail

0 items in basket



Order History
Total $


Saved Searches
View Basket 



 




Automotive and Transportation  
      




Automotive and Transportation

Aftermarket
Commercial Vehicles
Powertrain
Safety
Telematics




Freight
Logistics & Shipping
Rail
Intelligent transport systems
Airway
Public Transport
Company profiles




Banking & Finance
      




Banking & Finance

Retail Banking
Insurance





Wealth management
Banking Services




Consumer Packaged Goods 
      




Consumer Packaged Goods

Food
Beverages - Non-Alcoholic
Personal Care




Beverages - Alcoholic
Household Products
Company Profiles




Computer  &  IT
      




Computer  &  IT

Software
Cloud Computing
IT Services




IT Hardware Computer Products Distribution & Support
Company Profiles Country Overview (Computing & Electronics)




Consumer & Retail
      




Consumer & Retail

Clothing
Supermarkets
Electricals and Electronics

 

Housekeeping and Gardening Supplies
Food and Drink Specialists
Company Profiles




Energy, Utility and Renewable
      




Energy, Utility and Renewable

Utilities
Commodity
Natural Resources




Renewable Energy
Company profiles








Electronics & Security
      




Electronics & Security

Electronic Devices
Automatic Identification


Surface Mount Technology (SMT)
Company profiles




Internet
      




Internet

Advertising
Company Profiles
E-Commerce




Gaming
Popular Culture
Social Media




Manufacturing  &  Industry
      




Manufacturing  &  Industry

Industry
Automation & Process Control




Miscellaneous Manufacturing
Company Profiles




Pharma & Healthcare
      




Pharma Healthcare

Clinical Diagnostics
Biotechnology
Healthcare and Life Sciences IT




Medical Devices
Pharmaceuticals
Company Profiles




Sustainable Technology
      




Sustainable Technology

Country Overviews (Transport & Travel)
Maritime
Service Stations
Transport & Travel
Air
Bus




Company Reports (Transport & Travel)
Freight
Logistics & Shipping
Misc. Transport & Travel
Public Transport
Railway
Roads




Telecom
      




Telecom

Telecommunication  &  Broadband 3G / WiMAX
Conferencing  &  Collaboration
Mobile  &  Wireless




Network infrastructure  &  Security
Emerging technologies
Retail Systems
Enterprise solutions
Company Profiles




Travel & Lifestyle
	   




Travel & Lifestyle

Hotels
Travel Agencies
Modes of Travel




Art
Leisure
Luxury Brands














Delphi Financial Group, Inc. : Company Profile and SWOT Analysis





Publication Date
Jan 2014



Product Type
Report


Pages
14


Single User License help
$
					125.00					   


Site User License help
$
                      250.00


Corporate User License help
$
                      375.00









 














Reportstack.com does not charge credit card fee, transaction charges, extra tax or VAT on any purchase.






Summary
Table of Contents

Related Products
Speak with an expert


World Market Intelligence's "Delphi Financial Group, Inc. : Company Profile and SWOT Analysis" contains in depth information and data about the company and its operations. The profile contains a company overview, key facts, major products and services, SWOT analysis, business description, company history, key employees, company locations and subsidiaries as well as employee biographies.Scope• Examines and identifies key information and issues about "Delphi Financial Group, Inc." for business intelligence requirements.• Studies and presents the company's strengths, weaknesses, opportunities (growth potential) and threats (competition). Strategic and operational business information is objectively reported.• The profile also contains information on business operations, company history, major products and services, key employees, and locations and subsidiaries.Reasons to Buy• Quickly enhance your understanding of "Delphi Financial Group, Inc."• Gain insight into the marketplace and a better understanding of internal and external factors which could impact the industry.• Increase business/sales activities by understanding your competitors’ businesses better.• Recognize potential partnerships and suppliers.Key HighlightsDelphi Financial Group, Inc. (Delphi) is a specialty insurance provider. The company provides broad range of insurance coverages, which include long-term and short-term disability, life, excess workers' compensation for self-insured employers, large deductible workers' compensation, travel accident, dental and limited benefit health insurance. Delphi's asset accumulation business emphasizes individual annuity products. Its products are primarily sold through independent brokers and agents. Delphi is  headquartered in Wilmington, Delaware, the US.Companies MentionedDelphi Financial Group, Inc.


1 Business Analysis1.1 Company Overview1.2 Business Description1.3 Major Products and Services2 SWOT Analysis2.1 SWOT Analysis - Overview2.2 Strengths2.3 Weaknesses2.4 Opportunities2.5 Threats3 History4 Key Employees5 Key Employee Biographies6 Locations and Subsidiaries6.1 Head Office6.2 Other Locations and Subsidiaries7 Appendix7.1 Methodology7.2 DisclaimerList of TablesTable 1:  Major Products and ServicesTable 2:  HistoryTable 3:  Key EmployeesTable 4:  Key Employee BiographiesTable 5:  SubsidiariesList of FiguresNo Figures Found






Title
Date
Price





1st Century Bancshares, Inc. (FCTY) - Company Capsule

By World Market Intelligence

This report is a crucial resource for industry executives and anyone looking to access key information about "1st Century Bancshares, Inc."The report utilizes a wide range of primary and secondary sou						...Read More




Jun 2015
 $75.00





1st Enterprise Bank, Inc. - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review

By GlobalData

1st Enterprise Bank, Inc. - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides a comprehensive insight into the company’s history, corporate strategy, business structure and operations. The report contains a d						...Read More




Sep 2014
 $125.00





1st Source Corporation (SRCE) - Company Capsule

By World Market Intelligence

This report is a crucial resource for industry executives and anyone looking to access key information about "1st Source Corporation"The report utilizes a wide range of primary and secondary sources, 						...Read More




Sep 2014
 $75.00





1st United Bancorp, Inc. (FUBC) - Company Capsule

By World Market Intelligence

This report is a crucial resource for industry executives and anyone looking to access key information about "1st United Bancorp, Inc."The report utilizes a wide range of primary and secondary sources						...Read More




Sep 2014
 $75.00





2014: Trends to Watch in Global Wealth Management

By GlobalData

SummaryThe global wealth management industry is changing rapidly due to regulation and compliance, product and communication innovation, rebalancing wealth markets, and developing customer attitudes. 						...Read More




Jan 2014
 $4495.00





2015: Key Trends in Retail Banking

By GlobalData

SummarySeveral trends will drive developments in retail banking in 2015, covering external factors such as regulation and internal factors such as mobile innovation. Banks will have to react by stream						...Read More




Sep 2014
 $4495.00





2016: Key Trends in Consumer Payments

By GlobalData

Summary
The increased levels of innovation and interconnectivity in banking and payments have resulted in an ever-expanding range of transactional possibilities, and are notably triggering a rewiring 						...Read More




Feb 2016
 $7995.00





2016: Trends to Watch in Wealth Management

By GlobalData

"Summary
The face of global wealth management is very different to five years ago. Many of the large international players have gone or are undergoing significant restructures as they adapt to th						...Read More




Jan 2016
 $7995.00





2017: Key Trends in Retail Banking

By GlobalData

SummarySeveral trends will drive developments in retail banking in 2017, including factors as diverse as changes to the regulatory environment, the emergence of artificial intelligence, and the long-a						...Read More




Jan 2017
 $5250.00





2020 Foresight: Non Resident Indians

By GlobalData

This report focuses on the Indian diaspora, which is the largest among non-resident South Asians. The report examines non-resident Indians (NRIS)’ investment attitudes and behavior, sources of wealt						...Read More




Apr 2016
 $4995.00











 
* Required field


Name *



E-mail *



Telephone 





Company  * 



Country *

Select
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Automobile
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegowina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote D'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Deutschland
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
France, Metropolitan
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard and Mc Donald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran (Islamic Republic of)
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Korea, Republic of
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Lao People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia, The Former Yugoslav Republic of
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova, Republic of
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia (Slovak Republic)
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands
Spain
Sri Lanka
St. Helena
St. Pierre and Miquelon
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen Islands
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State (Holy See)
Venezuela
Viet Nam
Virgin Islands (British)
Virgin Islands (U.S.)
Wallis and Futuna Islands
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe



Query  






 








 
 

 





Published By :  World Market Intelligence 











					  For support please contact:
US Toll Free
+1 888-789-6604


Asia Pacific
+91-9893555190 
							
							







 














 











To receive alerts about an update, future offers and discounts on this report, signup here.Email ID











 









 Companies
A
B
C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 


 Countries

A
B C
D
E
F
G
H
I J
K L
M N
O P
Q R
S T
U V
W X
Y Z 













About Us | 
	  Contact Us | 
	  FAQ's |
	  Terms and Conditions | 
	  Privacy Policy | 
	  Return Policy



 




Delphi Financial Group Inc. - The New York Times







































































NYTimes.com no longer supports Internet Explorer 9 or earlier. Please upgrade your browser.
LEARN MORE »









Sections

Home

Search
Skip to content
Skip to navigation




The New York Times







            Delphi Financial Group Inc.        

|






Search

Subscribe Now
Log In

0
Settings




Close search










Advertisement








Supported by






                Delphi Financial Group Inc.            


News about Delphi Financial Group Inc., including commentary and archival articles published in The New York Times.                    








Latest Articles







                    Tokio Marine of Japan Agrees to Acquire HCC Insurance for $7.5 Billion                
The deal would expand Tokio Marine’s business in the United States and broaden its specialty product lines.
By CHAD BRAY













OPENERS: SUITS

                    SERIOUS TALK                
He made a fortune in private equity, but Robert Rosenkranz's passion is public policy. That passion has led Mr. Rosenkranz, chief executive of the Delphi Financial Group, to organize a series of public policy debates under the rubric Intelligence Squared US. On Thursday, the Asia Society's New York headquarters, on Park Avenue at 70th Street, was packed with people paying $40 to hear six speakers kick around the question of whether religion plays too big a role in American life. Other programs on the schedule are scarcely less combustible: global warming, domestic surveillance and China. All the programs are already sold out.











                    Delphi Financial Sells Unicover                
Delphi Financial Group Inc. said today that it had sold Unicover Managers Inc., sending Delphi shares up 29 percent amid relief the company will not be responsible for losses linked to one of Unicover's insurance pools. Delphi, based in Wilmington, jumped $8.875, or 28 percent, to $40, its highest close since March 4.










COMPANY NEWS

                    DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP TO ACQUIRE SIG HOLDINGS                
Delphi Financial Group Inc. will acquire SIG Holdings Inc., a provider of workers' compensation insurance, for at least $175 million. Delphi Financial, which underwrites life, disability and personal accident insurance through its Reliance Standard Life Insurance unit, said late on Thursday that it would exchange 4.4 million shares, valued at roughly $75 million, and $55.5 million in cash for SIG. Delphi will also assume $45 million of SIG's debt. Delphi, based in Wilmington, Del., could make an added payment of as much as $20 million if SIG meets certain earnings objectives. SIG provides insurance through its Safety National Casualty unit, which is based in St. Louis. Delphi's stock rose $2.25 yesterday, to $20.25 a share, in Nasdaq trading.



















Search Articles
4 results for  sorted by newest









                    Tokio Marine of Japan Agrees to Acquire HCC Insurance for $7.5 Billion                
The deal would expand Tokio Marine’s business in the United States and broaden its specialty product lines.
By CHAD BRAY













OPENERS: SUITS

                    SERIOUS TALK                
He made a fortune in private equity, but Robert Rosenkranz's passion is public policy. That passion has led Mr. Rosenkranz, chief executive of the Delphi Financial Group, to organize a series of public policy debates under the rubric Intelligence Squared US. On Thursday, the Asia Society's New York headquarters, on Park Avenue at 70th Street, was packed with people paying $40 to hear six speakers kick around the question of whether religion plays too big a role in American life. Other programs on the schedule are scarcely less combustible: global warming, domestic surveillance and China. All the programs are already sold out.











                    Delphi Financial Sells Unicover                
Delphi Financial Group Inc. said today that it had sold Unicover Managers Inc., sending Delphi shares up 29 percent amid relief the company will not be responsible for losses linked to one of Unicover's insurance pools. Delphi, based in Wilmington, jumped $8.875, or 28 percent, to $40, its highest close since March 4.










COMPANY NEWS

                    DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP TO ACQUIRE SIG HOLDINGS                
Delphi Financial Group Inc. will acquire SIG Holdings Inc., a provider of workers' compensation insurance, for at least $175 million. Delphi Financial, which underwrites life, disability and personal accident insurance through its Reliance Standard Life Insurance unit, said late on Thursday that it would exchange 4.4 million shares, valued at roughly $75 million, and $55.5 million in cash for SIG. Delphi will also assume $45 million of SIG's debt. Delphi, based in Wilmington, Del., could make an added payment of as much as $20 million if SIG meets certain earnings objectives. SIG provides insurance through its Safety National Casualty unit, which is based in St. Louis. Delphi's stock rose $2.25 yesterday, to $20.25 a share, in Nasdaq trading.












Show More
Skip to Navigation















Go to Home Page »

Site Index

The New York Times


























            Delphi Financial Group Inc - Wilmington 19899 (New Castle County), 1105 North Market Street ...



































































                    Company directory and business data solutions



About Kompass







                                        Register






                                        Login







                                                    Login
×



                                                    Please fill in your login and password







Register
Login


Forgot your password ?


























								English

























Contact Kompass North America
Please contact one of our team of experts from Monday to Friday between 9am and 5pm or by email




+1 609 785 5986





Contact us











                    Search across 10.5 million selected companies  in more than  60 countries.

















or




all
suppliers
one company











Rechercher















                                    Data Access



Business solutions 
Sales leads? Online promotion?


EasyBusiness
EasyList


                        Free Guide - B2B Prospecting Success




                        KompassPublicTenders




                        Credit Card Payment 




                        Webinar



                                   Digital solutions
Booster
Promotional solutions
Register your company




See all business solutions

Videos & Tutorials

Quizz




EasyBusiness
Find the right sales leads!

                                With more than 10.5 million companies and 60 search criteria, our global B2B database, EasyBusiness, will help you find the right customer leads and marketing lists.
Find out more >


EasyList
Need help with finding prospects?
EasyList is our straightforward on demand tool designed to help you build personalised company lists from a global database of 9 million companies.
Find out more


Register your company
Build your free company profile!
If you are looking to expand into new markets or want to grow your sales activity, then register your company free of charge on the global Kompass B2B directory.
Find out more >


Booster
Engage your target audience!
Engage your target audience and attract new business leads using the Kompass.com our global online digital directory. With over 6m visitors per month from 69 countries worldwide, let us improve your SEO and increase your customer traffic.
Find out more >


Promotional solutions
Attract relevant enquiries!
Build, enhance and manage your company profile to attract visitors instantly. Use our PPC experts to help drive relevant enquiries through to your profile – cost effective, managed and GUARANTEED.
Find out more >


Free Guide
B2B Prospecting Success
Best Strategy To Find Targeted Leads And Drive Great Sales Results
 


PublicTenders
PublicTenders
Public Tenders
 


Payment Portal
Payment Portal
Credit Card Payment Portal
 


Webinar: Skyrocketing your Government Contracting
Public Tenders Webinar
Learn about the value of selling to the US Government, key market challenges, and how to find and respond to opportunities throughout the USA - Plus get three months free access to the database!
 

















Delaware






New Castle County




                                              Delphi Financial Group Inc





x


Every month we have millions of visitors on Kompass, looking for companies like yours. Register your company on Kompass and build your FREE company profile to attract those visitors.


Register


Login


Login








                        Delphi Financial Group Inc





                                            1105 North Market Street 
                                            Suite 1230 

                                    Wilmington DE 19899
United States







     Need to contact this company?




Call
Click to see their phone number








Call
Click to see their phone number















---




						Service 
						
						+ call price





* This phone number available for 3 min is not the recipient's number but a number from a service which will put you through to that person.
				This service is produced by Kompass. 
                					Why this number ?
















Service & free calls*






* This number, only available 3 minutes, is not your correspondant's number but the number of a service putting you through to that person.
This service is produced by Kompass. 
									Why this number ?










All the lines are busy at the moment, please try again in a moment.













                                    View map location






                                        View their website




Purchase online company lists of companies

Create your prospect list >











                        Delphi Financial Group Inc
×













                        Addresses of : Delphi Financial Group Inc

×

























                            Description



                            Key figures



                                    Executives



                                    Activities











Description
Key figures
Executives
Activities







						Company Summary

Delphi Financial Group, Inc. is a holding company whose subsidiaries provide integrated employee benefit services. The Company manages all aspects of employee absence to enhance the productivity of its clients and provides the related insurance coverage, such as long-term and short-term disability, excess and primary workers' compensation, group life, travel accident and dental. The Company's asset accumulation business emphasizes individual fixed annuity products. The Company offers its products and services in all 50 states and the District of Columbia. The Company's two segments are group employee benefit products and asset accumulation products.
Delphi Financial Group, Inc. is an integrated employee benefit services company. They alos a leader in managing all aspects of employee absence to enhance the productivity of its clients and provides the related insurance coverages.




					General Information




									Year established
1988



                                Type of company

							 Head Office



									Fax

										
											+1 302 787-3944 (FPS)



									Website

http://www.delphifin.com/









Key figures



            Employees










                        Company

                        1000-4999 Employees






                Turnover




                                                2007 
Over 500 million USD







Executives



			Executive information


 

Download the executives list











												Robert  Rosenkranz



										Chairman Emeritus; Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer










												H. I.
											



										Corporate Executiv










												D. S.
											



										President










												R. M. S.
											



										Executive Vice President, Director










												C. W. C.
											



										Vice President and General Counsel of the Company; VP, General Counsel and Asst.; Senior Vice President, General Counsel, Secretary










												H. I.
											



										Executive Vice President - Business Development










												D. S.
											



										President and Chief Operating Officer; President and COO










												B. K.
											



										Vice President - Investor Relations










												R. W.
											



										Executive Officers










												S. K.
											



										Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer; Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer










												T. B.
											



										Senior Vice President and Treasurer










												N. S.
											



										Vice President Finance










												P. M.
											



										Chief Technology Officer










												W. M.
											



										Vice President Actuarial Reliance Standard Life In&#8230;










												E. W.
											



										Assistant to the Chairman










												G. S.
											



										Chief Information Officer










												G. R.
											



										Executive Vice President Safety National Casualty










												P. H.
											



										Avp, Financial Reporting










												T. B.
											



										Senior Vice President and Treasurer










												V. K.
											



										Senior Vice President and Head of Investments










												S. K.
											



										Chief Financial Officer, Executive Vice President and Member of The Board of Directors










												S. T.
											



										Senior Vice President and Chief Risk Officer










												M. H.
											



										Assistant Vice President










												C. C.
											



										Senior VP, Secretary and General Counsel









Activities



                Activities


 Producer
 Distributor
 Service provider



Human resources (HR) consultants

 Employee benefit consultants



Holding companies and groups of companies

Life insurance companies

General insurance companies

 Insurance, personal accident

 Insurance, damage and loss, marine hull, engine and equipment

 Insurance, explosion and fire



Health insurance companies







                Other classifications (for some countries)



SIC (US 1987) : 
Life insurance (6311)
NAICS (US 2012) : 
Direct Life Insurance Carriers (524113)










You might also like



















     Contact

            Delphi Financial Group Inc





Call
Click to see their phone number








Call
Click to see their phone number















---




						Service 
						
						+ call price





* This phone number available for 3 min is not the recipient's number but a number from a service which will put you through to that person.
				This service is produced by Kompass. 
                					Why this number ?
















Service & free calls*






* This number, only available 3 minutes, is not your correspondant's number but the number of a service putting you through to that person.
This service is produced by Kompass. 
									Why this number ?










All the lines are busy at the moment, please try again in a moment.











You might also like:












Wurth Group Of North Amer...


                                                         
                                                        Ramsey
Holding companies and groups of companies












The York Group


                                                         
                                                        Pittsburgh
Holding companies and groups of companies
















The Hillman Company Inc


                                                         
                                                        Pittsburgh
Holding companies and groups of companies












Silver State Bancorp


                                                         
                                                        Henderson
Holding companies and groups of companies
















American Commercial Holdi...


                                                         
                                                        Wexford
Holding companies and groups of companies












Discover


                                                         
                                                        Farmington
Holding companies and groups of companies
















Intertech Security, Llc


                                                         
                                                        Warrendale
Holding companies and groups of companies












Southern W & S / Pittsbur...


                                                         
                                                        Pittsburgh
Holding companies and groups of companies
















Devco Corporation


                                                         
                                                        Wyckoff
Holding companies and groups of companies












Cigna Global Holdings, In...


                                                         
                                                        Claymont
Holding companies and groups of companies
















V Ampco-Securities


                                                         
                                                        Wilmington
Holding companies and groups of companies












De Novo Corporation


                                                         
                                                        Wilmington
Holding companies and groups of companies
















Universal Enterprises, In...


                                                         
                                                        New Castle
Holding companies and groups of companies












Aaron Enterprises


                                                         
                                                        Southington
Holding companies and groups of companies
















Chase Family Llc


                                                         
                                                        Hartford
Holding companies and groups of companies












G W Resources, Inc


                                                         
                                                        Pittsburgh
Holding companies and groups of companies
















Credit One Bank


                                                         
                                                        Las Vegas
Central banks












Federal Home Loan Bank


                                                         
                                                        Pittsburgh
Central banks
















Bank of America


                                                         
                                                        Wilmington
Commercial banks












Columbia Bank


                                                         
                                                        Fair Lawn
Commercial banks







 
 




Our business solutions









With Kompass :




                            Global presence in more than 60 countries





                            Detailed and up to date company information





                            Comprehensive and filtered company directory


















				                Frequent updates ensuring high quality data






                                    Secure online payment






                                Help with expert advice






    	            			Dedicated customer service team













Contact Kompass North America




Contact us























































DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP, INC. | Revenue and Financial Reports - D&B Hoovers








































































Menu









Buy Reports & Lists
How It Works




United States
United Kingdom



(855) 891-0791


Login
















Company
People
Industry





Search D&B Hoovers: Company | People | Industry








Login





Avention OneSource is now D&B Hoovers. Login here for access to D&B Hoovers, D&B DataVision, D&B Business Browser and iSell
Login







For customers of Hoovers prior to March 1, 2017.
Login




















Call (866) 473-3932





Chat software by BoldChat



Start Free Trial








Call (866) 473-3932





Chat software by BoldChat



Start Free Trial




















Search the D&B Hoovers Database

Company

Company
People
Industry

















Home
                >Company Information
                >Company Search
                >Company Overview - Revenue & Financial Data

















Company Profile


Information For


Sales Preparation


Marketing Contacts


Competition


Revenue & Financial


Available Products


Company Report


Insurance Carriers Industry Report


Property/Casualty Insurance Carriers Industry Report


Life Insurance Carriers Industry Report















DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP, INC. Revenue and Financial Data

   One doesn't need an oracle to see that Delphi Financial Group knows a thing or two about employee benefits and insurance. Through Reliance Standard Life and Safety National Casualty, Delphi sells disability, excess workers' compensation, group life, and personal accident insurance to small and midsized businesses. Its Matrix Absence Management subsidiary provides disability and absence management services to larger employers. The company also offers asset accumulation products, mainly annuities, to individuals and groups. Delphi Financial's products are sold through independent brokers and agents in the US. In 2012 the insurance group was acquired by leading Japanese insurer Tokio Marine Holdings.
  







Financials Information for DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP, INC.

        Track this company’s financial condition.
View Company Report
Request Your Free Trial




Income Statement
Cash FlowBalance SheetCredit Rating







Income Statement (mil)





Revenue
$1068.746026 (Estimated)


Gross Profit
$0.0 (Estimated)


Operating Income
$0.0 (Estimated)


Net Income
$0.0 (Estimated)


Diluted EPS
$0.0 (Estimated)










Cash Flow (mil)





Cash at the beginning of the year
$


Net Operating Cash
$


Net Investing Cash
$


Net Financing Cash
$


Net Change in Cash
$


Cash at end of the year
$


Capital Expenditure
$










Assets (mil)





Current Assets


Cash
$


Net Receivables
$


Inventories
$


Other Income Assets
$


Asset Summary


Total Current Assets
$


Net Fixed Assets
$


Other Noncurrent Assets
$


Total Assets
$






Liabilities (mil)





Current Liabilities


Accounts Payable
$


Short Term Debt
$


Other Current Liabilities
$


Liability Summary


Total Current Liabilities
$


Long Term Debt
$


Other Noncurrent Liabilities
$


Total Liabilities
$






Stakeholder's Equity (mil)





Equity


Preferred Stock Equity
$


Common Stock Equity
$


Equity Summary


Total Equity
$


Shares Outstanding








Credit Rating
              
                
                        Low
                        These businesses have a low projected risk of delinquency and a moderate to low risk of failure. 






 Need to go deeper? No problem.  Save time with complex financial data at your fingertips Access financial statements, SEC filings, earnings estimates, and more Call (866) 473-3932 to talk to a Business Information Consultant    Request Your Free Trial    


































FREE Alerts to Changes in Your D&B® Credit Scores!* Sign Up.
Get CreditSignal® for FREE!*












Try D&B Credit FREE for 30 Days! Get Started.
Try D&B Credit FREE for 30 Days

























DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP, INC. | Company Profile from Hoover’s - D&B Hoovers








































































Menu









Buy Reports & Lists
How It Works




United States
United Kingdom



(855) 891-0791


Login
















Company
People
Industry





Search D&B Hoovers: Company | People | Industry








Login





Avention OneSource is now D&B Hoovers. Login here for access to D&B Hoovers, D&B DataVision, D&B Business Browser and iSell
Login







For customers of Hoovers prior to March 1, 2017.
Login




















Call (866) 473-3932





Chat software by BoldChat



Start Free Trial








Call (866) 473-3932





Chat software by BoldChat



Start Free Trial




















Search the D&B Hoovers Database

Company

Company
People
Industry

















Home
                >Company Information
                >Company Search
                >Company Overview - Profile


















Company Profile


Information For


Sales Preparation


Marketing Contacts


Competition


Revenue & Financial


Available Products


Company Report


Insurance Carriers Industry Report


Property/Casualty Insurance Carriers Industry Report


Life Insurance Carriers Industry Report

















DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP, INC.Company Information

1105 N Market St Ste 1230Wilmington, DE, 19801 United States(302) 478-5142 †

Top 3 Competitors

PRUDENTIAL FINANCIAL, INC.
Stancorp Financial Group, Inc.
UNUM Group



Unlock more access to Hoover’s!

Build customized email lists 24/7, based on your best customer profile.
Learn more about the companies you want to sell to. Hoover’s has reports on 85+ million companies and 900 industries. 65,000 data points are updated each day. 
Get real insight written by real people – exclusive research and reviews by our in-house Editorial staff.
We can deliver our data to your desktop, to Excel, direct to your CRM, into your custom app, or via mobile. 


Request Your Free Trial

Call (866) 473-3932 today to get started with a FREE TRIAL!
 



 

DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP, INC. Company Profile

   One doesn't need an oracle to see that Delphi Financial Group knows a thing or two about employee benefits and insurance. Through Reliance Standard Life and Safety National Casualty, Delphi sells disability, excess workers' compensation, group life, and personal accident insurance to small and midsized businesses. Its Matrix Absence Management subsidiary provides disability and absence management services to larger employers. The company also offers asset accumulation products, mainly annuities, to individuals and groups. Delphi Financial's products are sold through independent brokers and agents in the US. In 2012 the insurance group was acquired by leading Japanese insurer Tokio Marine Holdings.
  
† Some telephone numbers on the Hoover’s site may be on a country’s do not call or do not contact list including, but not limited to, the United Kingdom’s CTPS or TPS registers. It is a legal requirement that companies do not make sales or marketing calls to registered numbers. These are central opt out registers whereby corporate subscribers and individuals can register their preference not to receive unsolicited sales and marketing telephone calls. By using the information provided on the Hoover’s sites, as the direct marketer you represent and warrant that you will use such information in compliance with all applicable local, state, national or international laws and regulations, including any local do not call registers or marketing regulations, and agree to defend, indemnify and hold harmless Dun & Bradstreet and each of its affiliates in the event your use violates such laws and regulations.

Additional DELPHI FINANCIAL GROUP, INC. Information

Sales Preparation

Get relevant industry context to prepare for your next sales call – trends, competitors, news, call prep questions, and more.



Marketing Campaigns

Find prospect companies that meet the profile of your best customers to maximize campaign ROI.




Strategy & Planning

Identify new market opportunities and new strategies for existing markets.



Credit Management & Finance

Determine and track a company’s financial condition.




Related Tags

Wilmington, DE, United States
Insurance Carriers
Property/Casualty Insurance Carriers
Life Insurance Carriers







































FREE Alerts to Changes in Your D&B® Credit Scores!* Sign Up.
Get CreditSignal® for FREE!*












Try D&B Credit FREE for 30 Days! Get Started.
Try D&B Credit FREE for 30 Days





















